An excellent place along University Avenue for lunch! (Especially the caprese -- fantastically fresh mozzarella!) Cafe Renzo has a great, fancy-cafe type feel, and is pretty spacious on the inside, despite it's relatively modest storefront. A great thing about Cafe Renzo is that they have a fairly large and delicious-looking menu. Not only do they offer both brunch (breakfast/egg type dishes) and lunch until 4 P.M., but they also seem to offer dinner entrees for lunch as well. Great for those who like their options. To start with, Cafe Renzo's bread is unlike other bread at other restaurants. The rolls here actually have real flavor, which is a decided plus. I ordered their caprese appetizer, which was FANTASTIC. It had the freshest burrata mozzarella I've ever had, along with some equally yummy tomatoes. I ordered an omelette with Italian sausage as a main course, and it was also tasty. The eggs were soft and cooked to the right consistency -- no overly hard, rubbery eggs here! The filling was a solid amount, and the sausage had great flavor without being too salty. All the servers were really polite and they were very on-the-ball as far as refilling my water, even though I could have done this myself since the carafe was on the table. Bonus points there. My lunch experience at Cafe Renzo means I will definitely be back to try their dinner selections!
I found cafe Renzo to be a nice Little spot on University Ave. There's quite a few spots there in Palo Alto so you have to try them all. My Father and I were there after work about 5:30 so we ordered off the Happy Hour menu. We enjoyed a couple drinks and appetizers. Pizza, Salad and artichoke's were all good. The atmosphere was great and we really liked it our first time there. Being honest I would have given them 5 stars, but the service was a little slow and we had to ask for water a couple of times a well as bread. Also, they didn't clear used dishes throughout the service making it difficult for spacw on small table. Minor details that happen at a lot of places. Those are just simple details that management should work on.  We are going back this week to try the dinner menu.I say try it for yourself, it's good.
this has become one of my "go to" places in downtown palo alto for good food and drink, and my review is long overdue, so i'm doing a write-up for each of my visits in this one review. my first visit here was for an UYE a couple of months ago.  it was a small gathering, just five of us, so it was a good number to chat and get to know one another better.  unfortunately, it was terribly crowded so it was noisy and a tight squeeze.  i also stood most of the time since there were no open seats available.  on this visit, i had a bellini ($5) and shared some of the appetizers with the other yelpers.  the bellini was very good, a little too strong, but very good with lots of peach notes.  i also had a slice of the pizza margherita which was good.  note that they have many $5 cocktails and $5 appetizers available during happy hour which is from 4-7pm daily. on my second visit, i brought my friend for lunch to celebrate her birthday.  i ordered the seafood kebab ($21) which featured skewers of salmon, scallops, shrimp, eggplant, zucchini, and bell peppers, with a side of polenta.  the seafood was delicious, very fresh and made well, perfectly sized to fit on skewers.  the eggplant was a bit mushy, but the zucchini and peppers were good.  the polenta was a little charred, but had a good texture.  i felt the service was great, and i loved the music and ambiance.  it's definitely a lot more relaxing and peaceful during lunch hour (vs happy hour). on my third visit, i came for drinks with a girlfriend during happy hour.  this time, it wasn't very crowded, and they let us have a table even though we were just having drinks (normally these are for dinner patrons).  we each ordered a glass of wine for $4.  i can't remember which white wine i ordered, but it was very crisp and refreshing, a great way to start the evening.  since my friend frequents this restaurant, many of the waitstaff already know her and came up to greet us.  definitely the best service i've received in my three visits here. a great place to meet with friends for drinks or have a meal.  i especially like the indoor seating area which overflows onto their sidewalk/outdoor seating since the wall has been removed.
I've been here twice in the past couple weeks, coming both times with a friend. Cafe Renzo tries to provide a more upscale atmosphere than your average Italian restaurant - it is nestled among a row of fancy restaurants on University Ave., after all - but its food is rather lacking. While not bad, the dishes that I tried (the spinach and ricotta ravioli, and several of the pizza combinations) were uninspired and bland. The service was great on both my visits, but the food was disappointing. Combined with a rather limited menu for vegetarians outside of pizza and the average $15+ per dish price, I'm still searching for a go-to Italian restaurant in Palo Alto.
My grandmother once said, "Great food is what attracts patrons; great service is what keeps them."  Many amateur restauranteurs fail to understand the latter concept.  And, many restaurants learn this important fact far too late from their graves. I believe Cafe Renzo has not grasped this concept quite yet.  From my two separate frustrating experiences here, it makes me wonder if they ever will. The following review is based on my last experience at this restaurant several months ago back in March 2012. Upon walking into this Americanized Italian restaurant, I was instantly greeted with a host station as well as a chaotic group of patrons clustering in a tiny space with no sense of direction.  The two hostesses working the second night I visited seem to be in disarray, highly flustered, wearing a permanent angry scowl.  I don't completely blame them as they appear more frustrated with the table system than intentionally rude. My girlfriend and I were escorted to our seats half an hour later.  The dining room resembles a provincial, homely restaurant you would find in a countryside -- wood panelings and off-white wall papering -- but with some Vegas gaudy aesthetics of floral prints and combination granite installations.  Our server was a tall man, like a giant stomping through a miniature city of tables. I ordered the Bistecca ai Funghi, Cafe Renzo's New York steak entree.  My girlfriend ordered a pasta dish with seafood, which I cannot recall its proper name.  Her entree looked delicious with a creaminess to the pasta's flesh.  My dish, however, was over 2 minutes under medium rare; the middle fibers of the meat were purple, shiny, and lukewarm to the touch.  It's an honest misfire that many restaurants would happily take back.  However, when I told our server about the situation he seemed rather reluctant to take it back.  I felt like a kid in juvenile court having to preface that I did not take a single bite from the steak.  He finally apologized and removed the steak from the table. My replacement steak did not arrive until 30 minutes later.  My girlfriend who eats like a turtle (albeit a cute and beautiful turtle) was completely done with her entree when I began mine.  Thankfully, however, the new steak was nicely reddish-pink in the center despite the uneven the sear.  I must also note that the quality of meat was not spectacular or completely fresh given the beef's light sweetness was not present. Our unprofessional waiter, while friendly in demeanor, never came back to check on us.  He even had the audacity to carry a 10-minute conversation with an elder couple sitting at an adjacent table.  The waiter kept asking the elder couple about their vineyard, which ultimately led to the waiter sharing a glass of wine with them.  Yes, that just happened.  Meanwhile, patrons from his other tables looked visibly pissed off as to how unresponsive he was to their tables.  From that point, I quickly developed the same angry scowl I was greeted with earlier.  I caught the scowl plague. My check took another 20 minutes to close.  Why?  I don't know.  The server wandered around the restaurant like a fish swimming in an unfiltered fishbowl.  He seemed bored in his lack of self-awareness.  He finally came back to check on the elder couple and then turned and glanced at me to say, "Oh, right! Your check." I am giving this place 1.5-stars as its critical service flaws and food quality control are corrective with tremendous edits.  With that said, based on my experiences here I cannot recommend this restaurant to 99% of the population until major changes are made.  For the 1% who enjoy torture porn with their food, come here and enjoy.
I'd been here for happy hour before but I went here for dinner for the first time the other night.  Seafood was decent.  Tough, dry steak.  Terrible bread.  If the food were better, I'd love this place. Good happy hour and bar bites, but the dinner food needs improvement. Family-run with decent service.  Just avoid the steak.  And bread. I would still recommend this place for happy hour.  Bar bites are only $5.  And like buy 4 get 1 free.  Nice ambiance and good happy hour crowd.
Though it has been on my list of places to try, ended up coming here finally because I found parking right in front and was convenient. Overall, I really liked Cafe Renzo and will be back. It is tastefully decorated with high ceilings and has a nice bar. I liked the bruschetta and the the fact that it has a large piece of tomato as opposed to the chopped kind which ends up all over the place. Yes, I admit it. The salad with hearts of palm was really good as well. The ravioli was very flavorful and made me wish there was more. The tiramisu was excellent, creamy and delish and probably among the best I have had in the bay area. Also got to try the chocolate mousse which was again excellent. Next time, I am getting the souffle! Service was a little slow but OK overall.
I went here for lunch on a quiet week day. I sat alone street side; definitely a great setting for a lunch, business or casual. I had the Gnocchi which was pretty good; nothing stellar but it was good. I ate it all. I was a bit perturbed that the waiter didn't come by after I ordered because, 1) I wanted another beer and 2) I wanted to use the Yelp check-in special that I found, but nonetheless. If somebody brings up Renzo i wouldn't dissuade them from it but I probably wouldn't bring it up either. The menu wasn't exactly exciting but would suffice for a family dinner (the likes of which most of us loathe)...
Only came here for some after-dinner cocktails but it seems like it would be a nice place for a date or group dinner. The drinks were delicious but the bartender that made them was rude.
Good vibe, good service, decent food. Pasta is pretty standard, actually good portions. Not overly seasoned like other american/italian places. Highlight of the meal: Souffle al Cioccolato on the dessert menu - probably the best $7 dessert I've ever had. Worth every penny and then some. Without this, I'd give this place a 3 - it's pretty average for the price.
- This review is focused on the happy hour menu, which we have consistently liked. - The special menu for the happy hour lets you order 5 items for the price of only 4, and it includes should amongst roughly the following:  Cheese Pizza, Calamari, Fries, Onion Rings, Spanikopita, Olives, Bruschetta, Pigs in a Blanket, Fried Stuffed Olives, Fried Artichoke hearts, and some spring roll that we don't ever get (I think it has mushrooms in it). - I find the Pizza is quite good, and also recommend the Spanikopita (very flakey).  The other items are also good, depending on your taste preferences. - Happy hour drinks are a bit of a mix.  They offer Moretti for $3, which is a passable beer.  There are a smattering of house wines for $4, which I wouldn't really recommend.  And, there are a number of $5 cocktails, which is where I would say is the best choice. - Service for us has always been solid or better.  It seems like the gentlemen there are real deal Italians, which is nice. Definitely a good place to sit at the outside tables and do the happy hour special.  It's a go-to place for us on that note.  I definitely give them props for their HH menu!
SWU (Seriously What's Up) happy hour from 4-7 pm! $3 beers, $4 wine and $5 cocktails. And the appetizers are buy 4, get the 5th for free. If you needed an excuse to get a little cray cray on a weeknight, here you go, folks! My recommendations: Go for the $3 Moretti or $5 mimosa (they're not just for breakfast anymore) to drink and if you're with a group, go ahead and split 5 appetizers. They're not *huge* but there's certainly enough to go around. Calamari, mini pigs in a blanket and margherita pizza were the highlights. Probably not the smartest thing to pig out right before a workout class, but it's also not a good idea to go to such a function on an empty stomach. Carbs, right? Sit at the bar, grab a few seats and enjoy! This is a happy hour that most working folk in Palo Alto can enjoy.
Came here with my sister for lunch on a Saturday afternoon, and was greeted warmly by the waitress and waiters. The waiters are really sweet here. You can't help but give extra extra tip, lol. When we were seated, some house-made buns were given to us, along with olive oil and vinegar as dip (yes!). Tip: order for everyone and share. The dishes aren't small portions, and some are a lot heavier than others. Ordered the: Risotta ai Frutti di Mare: probably one of the best risottos I've eaten. As complimented by other people, it's cooked perfectly. I'm not a big fan of seafood (comes with clams, calamari, fresh fish & prawns), but I couldn't stop eating this dish. The sauce was a little on the salty side, but I evened it out with the other dish. I recommend this dish! Piadina Romagnola: this dish was a little on the bland side, so it went well with the risotto. I'm a sucker for prosciutto, so I also really liked this dish. I recommend eating  this when the flat bread it's still warm. Tartufo Affogato dessert was interesting. We were both extremely full, but still wanted to try a dessert. We never had cappuccino gelato before, so  we decided to try it. It comes with a shot of espresso, so the sauce is bitter by itself. It has a good balance when you eat it with the gelato, which amazingly does not melt very fast even though it's soaked in a hot shot of espresso. I would like to try the hh.
I had a great time with Yelpers last week for an UYE Happy Hour at Cafe Renzo. The appetizer deal (buy 4 get 5th FREE) was awesome! I arrived about 15 minutes later and the group already ordered the appetizers. I tried the deep fried calamary, the cocktail sauce was the BOMB! It certainly had a bit of a kick from the horseradish but it was very refreshing at the same time. The calamary was not thickly battered, crunchy in the outside and not overcooked so the calamary was not too chewy, very lightly salted so that the dipping sauces highlight all the delicious flavor. I also tried the deep fried artichoke, it was good too. I must admit it was my first deep fried artichoke (I've had artichokes but just never the deep fried ones) and I'll certainly order it again and again! yumm! I also had a slice of the Pizza Margherita that was VERY DELICIOUS and FRESH! The crust was very thin, the tomato sauce was very refreshing combined with the chewy melted mozarella cheese and the fragrance from the basil leaves...it was divine! Great prices on some cocktails, wine and moretti (beer)... yummmm! I will certainly come back for their happy hour and a meal!
My experience here was great!  We came here during the Palo Alto music festival, after passing out a bunch of free Yelp items and enjoying some great world music.  I suddenly had this craving for Italian food since I haven't had any for so long.  My boyfriend didn't like the idea of eating pasta, but I convinced him!  We decided to share a steak tartare and spaghetti alla carbonara.  I won't get into the whole story, but the steak tartare came with a fried egg instead of raw quail eggs, so we didn't want it.  I've never had it, so no harm done for me, because my boyfriend knew better.  It was kind of offensive they assumed all customers wouldn't care about the difference though. The spaghetti was so good!  I've never had it at other restaurants, so I have nothing to compare it to besides a home cooked meal, but it was delicious anyway!  The sauce was not heavy at all, which is hard to do with this dish.  They described it as a light creamy sauce on the menu, so I guess that's what convinced us, and they were right.  The sauce was really creamy, eggy, and cheesy, and the bacon bits were good, of course....it's bacon.  We ate that stuff so fast...I'm sure we both secretly wanted our own after the first bite. We also got dessert, since the appetizer fell through.  I've had many Tiramisus in my life, and I would rate this top 5.  Creamy, strong coffee flavor, and lady fingers that tasted light.  The surprise was the pretty decorated plate with chocolate and strawberry syrup that I ate with the cake.  Surprisingly good together.  Any place with good pasta and most importantly, a good Tiramisu, wins my vote..despite the mistake!
Cute open-air restaurant facing sidewalk; nice place to hang out Full bar and nice Happy Hour menu with drinks & snacks Very tasty house bread Beautiful beef carpaccio & gigantic burruta and prosciutto salad Delish branzino fish w/mash potatoes; loved the homemade parpadelle w/chicken & pesto Have osso buco on menu Good coffee drinks; loved the baby biscotti desserts Excellent food service by Sam
Happy hour here is a fairly good deal. You get $5 cocktails, $4 wines, and $3 beer, and it's from 4-7. Honestly though, the wine's are pretty standard, they're nothing special but they're generous with the pour. And for $4 a glass who's going to complain? The gin fizz cocktail was pretty good. It tasted kind of like a gimlet but less crisp and more sweet. Food was fairly standard. You do get lots of choices, so my friend and I decided to go with the calamari and the margherita pizza. The calamari was a-ok. It was crisp and not overly fried, and the marinara sauce that accompanied it was really tasty, with a slight hint of spiciness. The pizza was just ok. You could definitely tell the ingredients were fresh, but the crust was a lot more soggy than I would have liked. All in all, this place provides lots of choices for happy hour, and the service is great. I would come back with a larger group of people to do their "buy 4 appetizers get the 5th free" deal. For 2 people though, 2 appetizers was more than enough.
Great happy hour! 4$ wine 3$ Moretti Great appetizers The margherita and calamari were my favorite, but their bruscetta was really good too. Can't go wrong with their happy hour and it's close to my office!
I've been here more than 5 times and im doing this update because of CONSISTENCY! CUSTOMER SERVICE is always, always GREAT! FOOD are just lip smacking good! My favorite so far is their Cioppino and the Carpaccio di Manzo! I am a BIG fan!!! Hands down My favorite place in DTPA!
I only have 30 minutes lunch break from work everyday. On those breaks, I have to think of a place... Read more 
I'm always searching for a decent italian restaurant, since most in Palo Alto don't come close to meeting my expectations (my parents owned an Italian Deli growing up so I am very picky and would rather cook Italian myself). Decided to try this one out, since the rest on University Ave are not good. I was pleasantly surprised by the Gnocchi. In my experience Gnocchi is one of the harder dishes to get right, and if they can, then the rest of the food should be good quality. The other person I was with had chicken risotto, which I didn't try, but looked overcooked. I asked him and he said it was good.  I had Gnocchi with meat sauce. It was good and I would have it again, except it was a bit over priced for an ala carte pasta for lunch ($16). Service: HORRIBLE. The waiter came out after we were seated for a few minutes and immediately wanted our lunch order. No asking about drinks. I had to yell at him to come back and get our drink order. After that, we never saw the waiter again until he came back when we were done eating, didn't bother coming around to the side of the table we were facing, but rather spoke to us from behind our backs, and asked if we wanted anything else. If it wasn't for the bus boys who brought water, bread and our meal out, I wouldn't have bothered to leave a tip. The management needs to look at the unemployment rate and hire some staff who wants a job instead of someone who doesn't care. Overall it is a shame that a place with seemingly decent Italian food has such poor service. I'm not sure if I will bother to go back again.
I must be spoiled because my fiance is a chef and I've acquired a taste for quality and well seasoned food. Renzo has a really nice out door seating, beautiful on a sunny day such as today. The food... ehhh!!  I ordered the week special a mushroom risotto. It was under seasoned (salt didn't even do much to mask the bland taste), was no where near creamy,  and not to mention over done with the parsley. My fiance had the steak and eggs: his eggs were under cooked , and the steak lacked seasoning. We mentioned this to a gentleman whom took our order and this is what we were told: "in Italy that's how we make our risotto,  in America, Americans shower the cream. I can bring you the cream if you like" he said this with such defense and a facial expression as if he was the chef being criticized and we're not allowed to state our food wasn't good. I don't mind aldente risotto but for the sake of the food Gods Season your food please! Mind you he didn't offer to bring me anything else nor to take the item off the check after seeing I only took a few bites. Trust I have had risotto from numerous authentic Italian restaurants and this one is the worse of the worse. We certainly don't mind paying top dollar for good food, this joint was way to pricey for shitty under cooked and season less food. Our experience  was good up until we tasted the food, will we come back you ask?!? NO!!! I would highly suggest this establishment to teach their staff some customer service etiquette. Excuse me while I go brush my teeth, this overwhelming parsley flavor is killing me! Ugh!
We get it. You're having a hard time choosing a place for dinner, as always. Us too. Renzo, though, is always a default for us when we're looking for good Italian food in Palo Alto. We've always left satisfied. A great place for that Friday night date when you want to impress but not break the bank. Though they're always bustling with guests, we've never had to wait for a table (and are great about making/changing reservations if you need to!). We love that the owner is Silician and that many of the waiters are too--sort of the same feeling that I get when a Vietnamese place actually has Vietnamese waitstaff. Our personal favorite waiter is Mario, though one of the other waiters is very nice too. We've been here quite a few times, but the most recent visit for a birthday dinner. **Warning: come late in their dinner service and they may have already run out of some of their popular dishes! It's a total bummer when we order something and find out 10 minutes later that they're out and then have to reorder. Come on, can't you adjust for demand? Probably our only complaint about the place and why we deducted a star.*** Dinner comes with complimentary starting bread rolls. The specials are fantastic. We recommend the short ribs and the lobster ravioli. Portions for everything are very reasonable, maybe even on the large side for this type of place. Apps we've had and liked: caponata (DELICIOUS stewed eggplant, totally didn't expect that), the reliable calamari, caprese, and bruschetta. We appreciate that they use good balsamic. Mains: gnocchi alla bolognese, gemelli alla carcerata (decent), saltimbocca di Vitello, maiale alla Val Dostana, braised short ribs (I LOVED this!) and the lobster ravioli (delicious, but probably not enough for a big eater). I'd love to try their osso buco next time. Desserts: We enjoyed the mousse and the panna cotta. For a chocolate girl, the panna cotta was very good with the berry flavor. Wines: Great wine selection! Extensive list. I actually like their selection more than I like the selection at Gravity (surprising for a wine bar...). We had a complimentary limoncello once that haunts my salivary dreams. Loves me some citrus. If you're here for a birthday and want to bring your own cake, be aware that there is a cake cutting fee--I think it was something like $2.50/slice.
I went here with high hopes and left sorely disappointed.  The service is slow and the kitchen is worse.  I first ordered the sole off the special list.  After taking forever, we received our food and I was surprised by how bad my food was.  The food was overcooked, the sole was mush and the cauliflower had no taste.  The risotto rice cake had the consistency and taste of a hockey puck, albeit a hockey puck that had been in the oven for a few hours.  After I sent the dish back, I waited nearly an hour to receive the replacement, a steak cooked beyond recognition.  I ordered a steak "medium rare," and received something that was closer to "very well" than "medium rare."  How do you mess up a medium rare steak? Throughout dinner, the service was incredibly slow and rude.  With all of the restaurants in the area, do not make the mistake of going to Cafe Renzo, you could do better at every other establishment in Palo Alto.
Going downhill fast!  We were fans from the opening, but I think there's a reason they aren't full like other places on University Ave. Service:  AWFUL. We were seated by the hostess station (worst table in the place - you're literally about a foot away), for no logical reason, as the place was barely 1/3 full. Then we had to endure a chain of mindless chatter of the waitstaff and hostess. They like to congregate at the hostess desk and bs. Lucky us.  If they had so little to do, there was no reason for service to be so slow.  We ordered and then hardly ever saw our waiter again... other than we he stopped behind us to talk to the hostess.  When it came time to pay the bill, we were getting so frustrated waiting for him to come pick up the credit card, we considered dropping it on the hostess desk, figuring she'd see him before we would! Food:  very disappointing. My calzone was lukewarm and not cooked completely. I would have sent it back, but after having to ask 3 times for a simple glass of wine, I was afraid I'd never get to leave! Calamari was ok (I've had better, including from there). Grilled veggies were disgusting and tasted old (can't describe the level of gross - I spit it out). Bread was either stale or overcooked. Butter tasted very strange... like blue cheese.  Ew.  Water was never replenished. Not sure if we'll ever go back after this trip - too many other restaurants that we know are good.
Went back for dinner the other night and took my kids... I think I'll regret that.  Now they want to... Read more 
I almost had a five star experience here... almost.. First of all I just want to say that the service here is outstanding. I absolutely love that and it is very important to me. Being a bartender, you really get to understand what it is like to just be genuine to people and to just give them a great time: it will really makes them enjoy the establishment and make them want to come back. Countless encounters for me where great food or drinks is eclipsed with terrible service and it is sad because I never return to those places. Our waiter here: helpful, polite, and very attentive. We had glasses and a water carafe on our table, dining on a hot summer day and our glass was never empty. We ordered the steak tartare for an appetizer and the spaghetti alla carbonara. A little nervous because I love steak tartare and this was my girlfriend's first time. I crossed my fingers that she will love it too. I was disappointed as soon as it came out. Usual presentation.. but whats this?? A fried chicken egg on top on the steak tartare? So big that you can't even see what was plated itself? OMG I was fumed. Well not angry.. just really really offended. I talked to our waiter and explained that this dish is suppose to have a raw quail egg on it, not a sunny side up fried egg on it. Its how I have always had it and its how it should be... it even said on the menu. He went to check with the chef and came back. He said that they were suppose to get a shipment of quail eggs, but didn't.. so they used a fried egg instead. He offered to take it back and yes... please take it back. I took it really offensively because I took it as a notion that the chef was relying on the ignorance of their guests and that is not okay with me. I really hoped no one else tried this dish as their first time and this abomination was their first experience. I almost... almost didn't want to try the next dish because of the lack of respect I had for the chef. Glad I did try though... I tell you what. The carbonara... OUTSTANDING! Best I have ever had. The sauce was light, and O so cheesy! Not the heavy eggy sauce I have had before. Totally made my mood and I was soo happy with the dish! A must try! It was a complete turn around for me. And dessert... of course the tiramisu! Yum! Of course I have a really biased opinion of tiramisu though. Delicious! Light, fluffy, and definitely hit the spot. There are many things I like about this place. The mannerism of the wait staff, the patio seating, and the perfectly proportioned sized entrees (I have recently been notice how large all my food is when I eat out!). A great place... just one really big mistake that just killed it for me :( People are more aware of things now and you really can't try and pull something like that.
The restaurant is nice, great location and the outside seating on university ave is great on a sunny day..... Food was very under seasoned and a mediocre presentation! I ordered the steak n eggs, my fiance had the mushroom risotto. My eggs were undercooked and although my steak was grilled right it had no salt or pepper SMH! My fiance's risotto lacked creaminess and flavor!! We are talking about rice and mushrooms with a cream base sauce..... come on guys if the customer is telling you that its not good, and you can clearly see that the customer has only taken 2-3 bites it should be something to try and fix, but our waiter instead tried to make us feel stupid by saying that the risotto  is cooked like that in Italy, and that only americans like it drenched with cream!! Of course I dint leave a tip!!! Hopefully this waiter will think twice  about giving his pov and really attempt to fix the issue with future guest! Bottom line don't go  to Renzos is over priced, food and service really unpleasant!
This review is strictly for dessert.  We came here one Saturday evening after leaving Shokolaat because they had run low on their desserts. We took a look at the dessert menu here, and I was sold.  'They had me at' all of their chocolate martinis and espresso martinis listed on the menu. We ordered tiramisu and the tartufo affogato (cappuccino gelato with ooey gooey chocolate/coffee flavored filling sitting in a shot of espresso.  The tiramisu was really good.  Almost too good - after 2 or 3 bites, I didn't really need anymore because it was so rich!  And the affogato was really yummy, as well. I also ordered a glass of port - they don't mess around with making sure their serving size of port is spot on small.  Small glass to go with it, too.  But, the port I ordered was SO good, I sipped it in teeny sips to make it last as long as possible.  Was like velvet in my mouth.  (Fonseca Bin #27 was the port.  I wrote it down for future reference) The service was great, as well.  So, why the 3 stars? The chair (it was one of those booths along the wall with chairs on the other side set up) I sat in was so uncomfortable!  It looked nice - leather chair with cushioning and a tall back.  When I sat in it I sank until my legs/butt could feel the frame of the seat of the chair.  And, for the record, I'm far from overweight (look at my pic to prove it)!  Luckily, there was another type of chair close by that I switched to instead.  One with no cushioning - just a plain, flat seated, no frills chair.  When you switch to that, you have to wonder... We were also seated very close to the front of the restaurant, next to the window/doors that can open up during good weather onto University.  Well, they were closed, but they didn't keep out the cold.  Brrr.  Pretty drafty.  So avoid sitting there on a cold night, if possible. Oh, and shortly after we ate here, I told my fiance my tummy was feeling yucky and hurt a bit, and he said his felt the same.  Hmmmm...not a great sign. I think we're on the fence on whether we'd come back here.  Probably not until we've tried a bunch of other restaurants first...
YOU CAN'T BEAT THEIR HAPPY HOUR DEALS! - 3 glasses of their Pinot Noir - HH Margherita Pizza - HH Calamari - HH Mushroom+Asparagus thingie - HH Spanakopita - (But 4 get 1 free) - Bruscheta! Total: $38.97 (sans tip) Seeing as I live in SF and a lot of my friends are in the PA/MV area, Cafe Renzo is a great half-way point - not too far from the freeway and parking by the evening is usually a breeze (within a 2-block radius) Although the interior is seriously elegant and classy looking, weather permitting I always end up sitting outside as I sip my wine, read my book, and wait for my dinner date. The food's good, the staff's super friendly (we had Sam and he was charming!), and the ambiance is very conducive to a good evening of catch-up & QT.
I came here for a friends "going away" party and mostly was kind of let down a bit. From a rating standpoint, it loses 2 stars from the selection on their menu and the prices. It being on University Ave it definitely prices itself there. It is not cheap. The decor on the inside is very trendy and elegant and does draw you in with their blue sign out front. I am a sucker for blue! Where this place made up for it though was at the bar. The bartender we had served us all through the night and made a good amount in tips that's for sure. He was friendly, lively, and made staying worthwhile I would give their food a try again if I go back since I only ordered a calzone and wasn't that enthralled by it.
WARNING!!!! DO NOT EAT HERE!!!! Stopped by here last week with my friends. Order the Filet Mignon and ate half of it because I was so hungry. I ended up throwing up all night afterwards! Had to miss my movie date with my friends =(. I woke up with a fever and checked into the hospital. My doctor said I got food poisoning. ****0 out of 5 stars
I had heard from a bartender at Pasta Q down University that Cafe Renzo is the best place in PA. Not even close. My wife and I went there tonight for the first time. We caught the last 45 minutes of Happy Hour, so I got a 3-buck Moretti beer (nice dea) and we got the Bruscetta appetizer (bad deal, four pieces of bread with a tomato slice on top. We ordered our entrees. I was excited to see swordfish on the menu. I asked the waiter if it was a big portion and he said yes. My wife ordered a pasta dish with sausage for 16 bucks. Mine was 21-bucks. When the entrees came, the first thing we noticed was how small the portions were. My swordfish was a joke, though very tasty. It was three small pieces of fish rolled around some stuffing. Along side were six potatoes, which probably cost 20 cents and five pieces of asparagus, that might have cost them 40 cents. I was expecting an 8 to 10 oz. piece of fish in one piece. You know, like a normal piece of fish. We ate at Cheesecake Factory recently and that place blows Renzo out of the water. So does La Strada. Renzo has better ambience, a nice bar with a very nice bathroom. That's the only edge it has over C-Factory, which has much better service. Our waiter started out fine, but the last 20 minutes we were there, he was chatting away with a couple who were acting snooty with their glasses of wine. We didn't get the "Do you want any dessert?" treatment from our waiter. We asked a busboy for the bill and he flagged down another waiter because our waiter was chatting away still. I wasn't going to spend another dime there, but it would have been niced to have been asked if we wanted desserrt. They did the tiny caraffe-shaped thing with their glasses of wine (ala Fleming's), which is a ripoff, also. I won't be back for dinner, maybe happy hour.
It's hard not to notice the bright blue Renzo sign outside, and it's hard not to be charmed by the cute decor - inside, there are high ceilings, several sections including a bar area, and an ambiance that invite you to linger with your group or date even past closing. I was looking for a dessert place that still had a souffle, so we came in pretty last minute.  They have a pretty reasonably priced dessert menus, which include affogato, tiramisu, a chocolate souffle, sorbet, cannoli, creme brulee, and more.  They also have various coffee drinks like the beautiful looking vanilla latte, along with alcoholic versions like a brandy mocha and white russian cappuccino. As for the actual desserts, the chocolate souffle was turned out from the ramekin and texturally and presentation-wise reminded me more of a molten chocolate cake, which was a little disappointing.  There also wasn't a great sugar crust on the creme brulee. Setting wise, it's a nice place to take it easy, catch up with someone.  It's also nice that you can come just for dessert, but the items we tried weren't especially amazing.  Happy Hour seems like a pretty good deal, and they're open all day from 11:30 until 10pm (thank you for not kicking us out even at 11pm!). All the servers were attentive, observant, and very pleasant.  Seeing the staff seem like a family and enjoying the lasagna and pizza at the end of the night really added a warm touch to this place.
This is a charming place that has a nice old-school Italian feel to it.  The decor is comfortable, the bar expansive, and our waiter was Sicilian.  I started off the meal with a Negroni, as is traditional for me at Italian restaurants, and it was nice.  There were some specials and a menu filled with typical Italian fare.  The Sicilian took our order with infectious Italian flair.  We were all amped up for some good food. When the food came, it was a letdown.  We had a large party and sampled a good portion of the menu.  The fried calamari were decent.  The bruschetta included some delicious Roma tomatoes that were sweet but difficult to eat because the pieces were too large.  The salads were boring.  I ordered the monkfish Milanese-style, with pink peppercorn breading and served over a cherry tomato ragout.  The fish was excellent.  The waiter suggested a Sicilian white wine to go with the monkfish and that was very nice.  However, the side dish of cous cous cake was so dry as to be inedible and the purple cauliflower was just bland and had lost a lot of color in the cooking process.  Please, if it sucks, just don't put it on the plate.  The sea bass was lacking in presentation and taste.  Spaghetti carbonara is always risky at a place like this, especially with a large group - timing is everthing - and this turned out to be a risk we should not have taken.  The tortelloni with ham and parmesan fared better.  The cioppino was a decent rendition of this local classic. We were not really game for much dessert.  The rum puff - a profiterole soaked in rum and filled with pastry cream was ... well, just a soggy profiterole.  The gelato was decent but since when is gelato ever bad? I think, with more experience, we could really find this place enjoyable.  On this night, however, we will have to find Sicily elsewhere.
I only went here for dessert but the chocolate souffle here is amazing! It is one of the best chocolate creations I have ever tasted. I plan on coming back for more. The service is nice also as we came right before closing and were nice enough to serve us anyways!
My fiance & I had a very nice dinner here tonight.  I have yet to find great Italian food in the bay area, but this was probably the best I've had, at least in the South Bay.   We arrived about 10 minutes later for our 7:30 reservation but were seated immediately.    The servers all speak to you in thick Italian accents.  I couldn't tell if they were real or fake, but either way they were clearly exaggerated, which I found a little over the top. They brought us bread & olive oil right away.   The bread was pretty good and came out warm.    We were starving and devoured it right away, and then had to wait quite awhile for a replacement.   My fiance had the gnocchi bolognese ($16), which he was really happy with.    I originally considered getting something more traditional, but I felt like fish, so I had the halibut dore ($23).   It was two pan sauteed pieces of halibut in a light beurre blanc sauce with mashed potatoes and green beans.   My meal was excellent, one of the best fish dishes I've had in quite awhile.   Too often restaurants think "beurre blanc sauce" means "heavy cream sauce" or "lemon sauce."   This was a perfect, classic beurre blanc (I feel sort of snobby just writing that, but a lot of restaurants really misuse the term). For dessert, I had a chocolate souffle ($7).  This was in fact  a molten lava cake rather than a true souffle.   I knew this from Yelp photos, which was why I ordered it (I'm actually not a huge chocolate souffle person in general, they often don't seem chocolate-y enough to me).    But I could see how someone would be very disappointed if they were actually expecting a souffle here.  The cake itself was pretty good, but far from the best I've had.  It was pretty burned on the bottom.   It came with some nice vanilla gelato. Portions are pretty nice size - not enormous but not teensy either.  Especially with the bread, nobody will leave here hungry.   The service was pretty slow and was one of the weakest parts of the meal (although my fiance pointed out that makes the restaurant even more authentically Italian).  Prices (pastas $15 and up, entrees $20 and up, mostly) are pretty typical for nicer University Ave restaurants.   For the quality of food & the atmosphere, I thought it was a good value.   As I said, there aren't many good Italian options around here, and there was a lot that sounded appealing to us on the menu, so I'm sure we'll be back.
I finally got to stop here and try it out. I'd passed by a few times and had been  eying it for a while. Enjoyed a nice Sunday lunch with a girlfriend. I had the primavera panini which was amazing! She had the shrimp salad w/ warm lemon dressing and she raved about it also. Great ambiance, very cute decor, perfect for a date! Servers were attentive and extremely professional. A must try! We had bellini's, super yumm. and they have outside heaters too =)
Upon walking into this restaurant, I really wanted to like it. The ambiance was outstanding, dimly-lit, with blue lighting to set the mood. Just fantastic all around. I sat at the bar, and ordered their calzone. Unfortunately, it was very, very bland. There just wasn't much flavor to it, even despite my loading it with meats and cheeses. Also annoying, although I didn't take account for it when assigning a rating, was that there was a very large, very loud work party taking place just next to the bar. Difficult to enjoy the experience with that in the background. That, and I previously had to postpone my trip to Cafe Renzo because the first night I went--a Friday night, no less--they were closed to the public so that they could offer a private event. It should be noted that it's annoying, at best, that their space is routinely removed from public usage, or is crowded by large and obnoxiously loud private parties. Service is quite friendly, though. The bartender was very pleasant to interact with. That said, I probably will make a return trip. As I said before, I really want to like this place, and I see that Yelp has reviewed it relatively favorably. I feel that I should at least try one other dish, and until I do so, my best caution is to avoid the calzone.
I've been visiting Renzo's for approximately the last 10 months and I have to say after visiting the other Italian restaurants in downtown Palo Alto his is the most consistent. All good food uses the same two ingredients--time and love--and Renzo adheres to this. The bread is made in house and served warm and has that lovely crust which gives way to a pillowy interior. The Caesar salad, which I always begin with, is the best prepared salad in Palo Alto. I've had the Caesar at every restaurant in Palo Alto, from Flemings to Cafe Pro Bono to Cafe La Strada and whether its been too oily, not properly tossed or lacking plate appeal (for we eat first with our eyes) Renzo's Caesar, ironically served in an Italian restaurant, never disappoints. The pasta is also wonderful. His risotto is always al dente, never raw, and doesn't rely on cream and butter to attain that lovely unctuousness of satisfying risotto. The gnocchi is so soft you can masticate with tongue and palate, and his ode to his mother, lasagna della mama, regardless of containing vegetables or protein, is as far as you can elevate lasagna without making it overwrought. In short close your eyes and choose from any of the pastas and you won't be disappointed. The scene is lovely also. The staff always has a smile on their face, whether it be 9:45 on a Tuesday or a weekend afternoon, and although this may sound trite, their thick Italian accents lend to the ambiance in such a way that always warms the heart. The wooden bar is the centerpiece of the restaurant and the feng shui of the place seems to restore critical foodies and Palo Alto regulars alike. It stands in contrast to Osteria, La Strada, Il Fornio and all the other Palo Alto Italian restaurants in the most positive way--and mind you I've eaten several times at each one. And before I forget they are one of two restaurants in Palo Alto that serve Nolet's Gin. Nolet's dry with onions is the perfect introduction to a meal there and unlike Gravity I don't feel like I've been mugged when the bill arrives. In short give Renzo's a try. Check in on Yelp and he'll even throw in a soup or salad.
My hubby and I were walking on University Avenue and walked into Cafe Renzo as the ambiance was quite inviting. We were immediately seated and they served us bread and olive oil right away. We both are vegetarian and we found the choice on the menu quite limited . We had the ravioli in sage sauce and  veg lasagna. The portions were small  and the ravioli was tab bit salty. Overall an OK experience but I don't think we are going back.
I've been here several times and I'd give it a 31/2 stars.  On our most recent visit, I took my Best Friend for her birthday.  The server was nice, but it seemed like we were an inconvenience because as he mentioned, "I have a lot of bottles of wine to open". We waited for our entree which seemed like an eternity!  At least we had a bottle of wine and a salad to hold us over and were not in a rush.  This is the 3rd time I have had dinner here and the food is fairly good. Last time I had the Salmon, this time I had the veal which was a little tough for my liking but tasty.  Desert was on the house for my friend's birthday which was a nice gesture.  Overall service is okay, but it's really hard to get the Server's attention every time I've been there. The Happy Hour is reasonable, but they recently cut their portion size and most everything is fried. It's close and the food is decent and rather authentic, but if you are looking for a great overall experience, you might want to go somewhere else!
I came here for happy hour Tuesday night and was very impressed! Their happy hour is AWESOME! I had the Chardonnay for only $5 per glass and it was actually a very good one! My friend had the Savignon Blanc and she liked hers as well. They don't try to cheap you on the quality since it's happy hour! Also, there are some very good appetizers for between $5-7, a great deal! Also, they have a deal for buy 4, get the 5th free appetizers! great for a group or if you want to have a tapas style dinner! Happy hour is 4-7pm too, so a good amount of time! The bartenders were excellent also! Unfortunately I didn't get their names, but one was an Italian man and the other was a blonde woman. They were both very friendly and attentive! I will definitely be returning! I love a good happy hour!
This place was a bit pricey, but appropriate for being located on University Ave. The food was delicious. Our table especially enjoyed the meat and cheese platter. Our Italian waiter was VERY Italian -- quite flirtatious and a heavy accent -- he made the evening a lot of fun! I would definitely come back.
I liked this place! For an appetizer, we had the bruschetta (pronounced "broo-SKET-uh"- get it right, people). It doesn't look like the bruschetta you may be familiar with in that it was served on a flat,  panini-type bread and the tomatoes on top were large, quartered whole tomatoes. No matter - it was delicious! For an entree, I had the Tagliolini Mare Monte, which was pasta with shrimp and mushrooms in a flavorful (and slightly spicy) sauce. It was delish, too! I even used the bread to sop up the rest of the sauce. My BF had one of the lunch specials: the caprino, which was, essentially, a caprese salad sandwich (tomato, basil and mozzarella on panini bread). It came with a choice of salad, soup or fries. He chose the soup - minestrone. It wasn't the typical minestrone (tomato-based vegetable soup). It was more like vegetables in warm water. He wasn't overly thrilled with it. Our waiter, Eduardo, was a little over the top and very interested in showing us how cool he was because he's from Italy.  Correction: he's from Sicily. I told him my BF is Italian (last name Capone) and my BF explained he's 4th generation American, at which point Eduardo informed my BF that he's "not really Italian anymore." Other than that, though, a good meal. I'd come back again.
Since Cafe Renzo took over the old Niebaum-Coppola space, it's become a welcome respite from the too-shitty vs. too-fancy dichotomy in downtown PA restaurants.  The lovely Italian waiters are adorable, try not to be self-conscious about your terrible Italian pronunciation when you order but they love it.  Even my parents like it here, which is a surprise--never too crowded, not too noisy, understated bar area if you are into European "football" (soccer, whatever), huge beautiful space, nicely share-able small plates.  This is not a Bucca di Beppo style MANGIA MANGIA MANGIA establishment. I base my meals around two things on their menu every time I eat here: 1.) burrata salad-- salty, creamy, bitter and delicious all over. 2.) fried smelt with lemon and herbs-- a special, love a basket of small fishes! Def. need to try their happy hour menu since they have something called "Coney Island in a blanket" on there and YOU KNOW I LOVE IT. The bathroom is beautiful as well, somewhat hidden in a dark grotto in the back with subway tile. My one gripe was that they offered a crazy expensive $120 PER PERSON prix fixe menu for dinner on NYE, when I doubt if you ordered the entire prix fixe menu off of their regular menu it would even come close per person.  That's what I get for being unprepared on a major U.S. holiday.
My partner and I love this restaurant!  We have made it our "let's do something nice for ourselves" place.  Service, atmosphere, and especially food have never failed to please us.  I enjoy the huge calzones best, with my choice of ingredients and cooked to perfection!
We came here for a birthday celebration lunch. Service was excellent and the quality of food was also very high. This is as authentic Italian as you can get without going to Italy.
Probably never coming back here again... I LOVED their wine selection because they had my fav Hook & Ladder, but the service was pretty terrible. To be fair, we did have a group of 13, but it's not like we were rowdy or anything.  We were the only ones in the restaurant, and it was for a Friday brunch. The food was a hit or miss.  I really liked the arugula salad that I ordered, but their house salad was pretty terrible.  The corn they used for my salad definitely came out of a can.  So tasteless.  I tried some of my friends' pastas, which turned out pretty good, but portions were unbelievably small for ~15 a plate. Never coming back here again for food, but maybe for some wine.
Came by here for a birthday dinner with a party of 8. - Food: I ordered the orecchiette pasta which was fairly pricey for the portion size ($17) and not very tasty. - Service: Service here is very slow.  We had to flag down the waiter whenever we wanted more bread, or refill our water pitchers or to get the check.
The four stars are for the Happy Hour and only Happy hour.  Oh, and our waiter who taught me that Bruto meant idiot when I ordered a Brut.  I recommend outdoor seating so you can do people watching :) I actually really like Renzo.  The happy hour food is great, the waiters are great, the happy hour is FANTASTIC!  Happy hour Monday through Sunday!  It's so great :)  The waiters are busy during this time, so please be patient with them.  My only complaint is about one of the hostesses.  Dear god, I hope  this is her first job or something so that gives her some grace to act like a complete bitch.  Someone give the girl a hug or something so she could at least pretend that she enjoys what she's doing or give her a shot of alcohol to loosen her up for crying out loud.  Her terrible service pretty much ruined my happy hour experience.  Talk about buzz kill before shooting my champagne.  Thinking about her makes me angry.  Grr. If anything, if a bitch of a hostess is seating you, forgive her/him because she may be having a horrible day, week, month, etc.
Cute atmosphere, yummy cocktails & great food!
Pinot Noir wine & service was good.  Comfortable seating.  Did not have anything to eat, but it looked hearty!
The food was what I've come to expect from downtown Palo Alto (overpriced, faux-fancy, but not particularly creative or tasty).  But so was the ambiance (bustling but not overcrowded, friendly, civilized).  We managed to snag a couple of chairs in the patio area, and our server kindly let us pace ourselves through the happy hour and eat a leisurely dinner, so we had a perfectly lovely evening, but it owed very little to the quality of what the kitchen turned out. Better for sitting than for eating.
For the location and the ambience this was definitely not what I was expecting. Granted the turnover for this specific site is outrageous since it appears to change hands every 8-12 months but at least have a location that has something more to offer.  Let me begin by saying that I had high hopes for the location 1. it has a great location and 2. a great layout with vaulted ceilings etc. When it came down to it two things were out of place 1. service was awful and 2. the food was mediocre at best.  As for the service it was incredibly slow waiters needed to be hailed down like a taxi.  The food was alright but nothing great for italian and the bread pop-overs were a nice touch but tasted off and stale.  To top it off the chef of the restaurant was chumming it up with the italian speaking patrons next to us for 20 minutes.  The conversation got so obscenely boisterous that I could barely make out what my mother was saying to me 2 feet away.   All this place has going for it is that it is operated by real Italians and an outstanding ambiance. However for a place where I am expected to shell out 25-40 bucks I would expect something better than what I actually received.
Came for weekday lunch and the place were pretty empty. Service was pretty standard. Capellini al Pomodoro (angel hair pasta) : slightly undercooked for my taste but very yummy sauce. Piadine Romagla : doesn't look good and totally passable.
Starter salad was just okay. Not a whole lot of flavor and the greens were a bit wilted. The carbonara had a wonderful creamy flavor with lovely bits of prosciutto and was a decent portion. Service was adequate but not very attentive. Probably won't be back as there are many other Italian places to try nearby.
Previous Yelp reviews are correct. Service is slow. Mista salad was so so. Not much flavor and the... Read more 
I stopped in for a beer tonight. I ordered some food to go, 1 capellini, 1 risotto. The bartender looked me in the eye and asked "the capellini right?". I said yes. I received my food and drove 20 minutes home only to find out they'd given me the risotto and a ravioli dish. The ravioli dish was $5 more than the capellini and contains exactly 6 (six) raviolis. That's 17 dollars for 6 (six) raviolis. I called the restaurant to ask them about this and the person at the end of the phone said she's tell the waiter. It's obvious that the people who work at this place are idiots. Any good restaurant would have offered me to come back in and pick up the proper order.
I walked past this restaurant, thought it looked cute, so I gave it a try. I ordered a starter Caesar salad, and the Spaghetti Carbonara. The salad was dry, the dressing didn't have much taste, and there were brown edges on some of the romaine. Not very appetizing. They also garnished the salad with little cherry tomato halves around the edge of the plate. Not very authentic. The place was only about half full but it took forever for the spaghetti to be served, and when it did it looked as though it had been sitting under a heat lamp for a while. In addition, the plate was burning hot (like you get at a Mexican restaurant chain). The Parmesan cheese that they offered was pre-grated and actually looked like the stuff that Kraft sells in the little green cans. The spaghetti was not creamy, as I expect a Carbonara to be, and it was oily. Finally, even though I had pushed my plate away and waited for 10 minutes I ended up having to walk over and ask the hostess to send my waitress over with the check. I would not recommend this place, nor will I ever go back.
Food very average.   Ravioli dish sent back....way too salty. Sent out replacement (spaghetti arrabiata) which had capers and olives..also salty. Risotto:  Average Calimari....very average. Wait staff...very proficient but nothing special. Bottom line:  Very average.   Somewhat overpriced given the average experience
After a strong recommendation from a friend, decided to try it out myself and went there with an old friend from school at 7pm on a Friday night. PROs: - Reservation was no problem, thank you Yelp + Open Table integration. - The doors open up for a great indoor/outdoor seating area, allowing us to enjoy the early Spring breeze - We were able to enjoy catching up over a bottle of wine long after our plates were cleared - without so much as a hint from the management. CONs: - Our waiter was pretty irritating - he rushed our ordering, was never there when you needed him, and always interrupting when we didn't need him.  [ -1 star] - The food is just okay - pretty standard Italian-American fare.  We ordered: Carpaccio, Linguine with Clams, the Risotto Special, and for dessert an Affogato and Sorbetto.  I'm definitely an Itailan food snob, but none of the food felt special.  [ -1 star] Overall, I'd probably go back to take advantage of the Happy Hour deals - can't go too wrong with wine and Margherita Pizza, right?
Not sure where to start -- amateur service, unpleasant food seemingly purchased from Costco and reheated, very loud.  Not a nice restaurant.  I would avoid.
Horrible Service! Waiters are extremely rude. If you order a soda don't expect a refill! We were told that "we don't do that" and "You got 16 ounces, next time order without ice!" Food was marginal! Pick another of the 10 Italian restaurants in Downtown Palo Alto. This place is cutting corners to survive and won't be around much longer! Keep walking past this place!
When you walk into Cafe Renzo, it has an air of sophistication to it. In comparison to other italian places on the peninsula, I would say the food here is appropriately proportioned and the atmosphere is comfortable yet classy. My friend and I ordered the Portobello alla Griglia appetizer which was a grilled portobello mushroom with sun-dried tomatoes & pine nuts, on a bed of arugula. This dish was very tasty and did exactly as it was supposed to do, "wet our appetites." We then ordered two minestrone soups and the Halibut Dore Alaskan halibut filet pan-seared with a light lemon sauce and a side of mashed potatoes and green beans. YUM. I have to say.. these dishes did have A LOT of butter.. but they sure were delicious.. and very decadent. Cafe Renzo gets 4 1/2 Stars in my book! ;-)
I ordered Spaghetti Bolognese and it was OK. Just a tomato sauce with light meat and on the sour side. Actually it tasted like a regular Ragu sauce that anyone can cook in their kitchen and really nothing special. Since I am on the hunt for an awesome Bolognese, the only best one I found so far is at Cafe La Tosca in San Carlos. So, I would say stay clear of the Bolognese sauce at Cafe Renzo if you are a huge Bolognese fan as it will be disappointing especially for the price. I have paid much less and for much tastier Bolognese.
My boyfriend and I went up to Palo Alto today to escape the Monterey gloomy weather. We were headed to Santana Row but decided to head up a little further to check out downtown Palo Alto. By the time we got to Palo Alto, we were famished. After strolling down University Ave, we decided on Cafe Renzo because the decor and the menu looked inviting. Pros: ~ Cute outdoor bistro tables under a big blue awning ~ Big French windows that open up the inside to the outside, great flow ~ Vaulted ceilings with elegant lighting fixtures ~ Comfortable, spacious seating arrangements ~ Very clean restaurant, including the bathrooms ~ Excellent service with a friendly staff ~ Spinach and ricotta ravioli's ($16) were very good ~ Screwdriver($9) was nice and refreshing ~ Happy hour with wine and drinks from 4 -7 M-F Cons: ~ Panini's ($10) were awful, one of the worst I've had. No flavor and why did they use green tomatoes? ~ Baccala (cod crabcake with artichoke and potato, $9) was okay, except the artichokes were like needles going down your throat...so hard to get it down Cute cafe with great ambiance but the panini was so bad that I don't think I can give this cafe a second chance. We were starving by the time we sat down (only a cup of coffee consumed all day) ....and the panini was still not good. Hmmmm!! Not bad, but not great, so we'll venture to a new place for next time.
Stopped by for a drinks and appetizers but not for a meal; which means I can only comment on the ambiance and the service. The bar area was separate from the dining area; which offered a nice place to mingle if you're with a crowd. The service at the bar was fine; what was really nice though was the service when your glass was empty while you're  on your feet working the crowd. The decor is fine. The prices were reasonable for downtown Palo Alto. Street parking can be a challenge.
After a long day of working in Palo Alto, I found this quaint Italian restaurant on the strip of University Ave.  The atmosphere was bold yet  inviting. So, I wondered in. I was welcomed with a big smile and a cheerful "Hello" from the bar staff. It was a much needed uplift after being beaten up all day in the lab . I started with the Caprice salad, one of my favorites for any restaurant. However, it takes a lot to impress me with this salad. More than often the mozzarella is tough and  chewy. Much to my delight , it was soft and ripe . I also am very picky about the olive oil and how  light and fresh it tastes.  The olive oil was exquisite,  very fresh, and mild. My main course was a spicy seafood pasta made to order. I asked for extra spicy, and the waiter would not give up until I was satisfied. Also the home made lemon cello was smooth  going down. Very  delicious.The service was great. The waiter was very flirty , must be the Italian nature??  The  menu has a lot  to offer . I can not remember the last time I had such a good time in a restaurant. One thing I know for sure is I will be a regular at this place.
I escaped work slightly early so we could grab a bite before Yelp's Endless Summer Country Club event. The happy hour specials caused me to have my very first Gin Fizz but it wasn't my last!  Unexpectedly, the food was affordable for a place posing as a high end Italian joint.  In addition, the Pizza Margherit was some of the best I've had in quite some time and the Spanakopita was as expected.  Note, not all Caprese are created the same and this had an unfair advantage, the mozzarella was amazing!
My pasta was good & flavorful, but I wouldn't say great  I don't remember (not much lately) rhe entree name, but it had Italian sausage & broccoli rabe in rhe pasta & was a red sauce. The pasta dish was $17 My partner had the special seafood skewers that were kind of bland w/a boring coucous cake (2 skewers & cake $20. Overall I didn't find the menu very appealing. Let's see how long this place lasts. With Joya as a high standard for me on University, I wouldn't put money on the table for Renzo.  I might check it out again sometime for happy hour though  Nothing really to write home about.
Love this place, 7 day a week Happy Hour and lots of well paid men.
Sadly, "happy hour" is no longer offered at the cafe tables along the front of the restaurant. We were told we had to go to the bar to enjoy the happy hour menu. So we went to the bar to find the bar seating occupied and we sat on the couches opposite the bar. After sitting and waiting in full sight of the bar without any acknowledgment from staff, one of us went to the bar to order and bring our drinks. Needless to say, NO tip for that round.  The hostess had said there was wait-staff service at the couches but none came. When I asked a passing waiter if there was service at the couches I was told that, "well, yes. but it's very busy up front right now so you'd be better off just going to the bar to place your order".  Later, when the bartender finally gets a clue and comes over we are told we might not get happy hour pricing because it's very close to 7pm and the system may have automatically stopped happy hour pricing. Well, we'd been sitting there for 20 minutes waiting for service. Fortunately, it was a minute or two before 7pm and the system allowed our happy hour drink purchases. But funny thing, after 7pm when prices revert to standard pricing, the service suddenly improved. They are seemingly anxious to sell us full priced foods and drink and unwilling to sell us advertised happy hour food and drink unless we fetch it ourselves. Oh, and rather than risk over pouring or under pouring a glass of wine free-hand, they decant your glass of wine in to a tiny, precise one-glass of wine carafe and then pour it in to your drinking glass. To me this adds a cheesy and cheap feeling to the experience.  I would rather take the risk of the bartender under pouring my glass with his/her own judgement. But the establishment just can't take the risk of the bartender over pouring a glass by a tablespoon of mediocre wine. So if you want to enjoy this place for summertime eating and drinking on University Avenue, prepare to pay standard pricing for the privilege.
Service here was mind-fuckingly slow and the food was like a school cafeteria. Came here for a business lunch with a large group of 30. They put us at a table that could comfortably seat 25, so 5 people were sitting at a corner where there wasn't actually room. They eventually added more tables and made the table into an L-shape. My table was actually in the doorway to the kitchen. The restaurant was completely empty except for our table. Keep that in mind. We were the only people there. After being seated, half of us didn't have menus. We actually had to ask for menus. The service was beyond glacial. We had been there for 45 minutes before they even took our drink orders, and 1 hour before they took our meal orders. Our food didn't come out until we were there for 1 hour 40 minutes. Keep in mind this was a business lunch and we generally get 1 hour for lunch. When the food eventually did come out, it came one plate at a time, over the course of 15 minutes. Of course, the waiters had no idea who ordered what, and would come out with one plate of food and scream "WHO ORDERED THE SPAGHETTI?!" or "WHO ORDERED THE RISOTTO?" Honestly by the time they brought the food out, we had waited so long that some of us forgot what we ordered. One person in our group asked whether one of the appetizers was vegeterian, and the waiter said "I don't know, I'll go ask." He had to ask what's in the food he just served! Unbelievable! The food was crap. I ordered the calzone and it had a burnt, canned sauce taste to it. The dough was not even cooked all the way. The ONLY good part of this place was the fresh bread. For a table of 30 people, they brought out 2 small baskets of bread and a few tablespoons of dipping sauce. We quickly ran out of dipping sauce and weren't given any more. When we asked for more, they gave us another few tablespoons (after a 20 minute wait), but by then we had run out of bread. The waiter said he would bring more bread and never did. It's hard to fathom how an establishment like this manages to stay in business when they have nothing but contempt for their customers.
Growing up in the South Bay I never spent much time in Palo Alto. Usually if I was headed north on the peninsula I was going to San Francisco. However, every time I found myself wandering Palo Alto I was always fascinated with the landscape. Not to mention it has one of the richest zip codes in the county (thanks Zuckerberg)! While I was visiting my parents over the recent holidays my mom and I decided to take a spur-of-the-moment trip up to University Ave for some light shopping. On our way we were met with some lovely holiday traffic that turned the 20 minute drive into an almost 2 hour adventure. Then searching for parking added another 30 minutes or so. Finally, once we ditched the car, we decided we needed some grub before we both passed out from hunger. After walking a couple blocks we simply couldn't last any longer. We decided to duck into Cafe Renzo for a casual lunch. We were greeted in the entryway by the hostess and led to a small table by the window. The decor is upscale without seeming pretentious. There were leather chairs and the servers were wearing slacks and bow ties. One half of the restaurant was a dining area while the other side looked more like a lounge with a long, wooden bar with shelf upon shelf of liquor. We were given our menus along with our table bread and oil and vinegar. The bread rolls were warm, fluffy, and fresh. Our menu was half brunch, half lunch with paninis, pastas, and pizzas. I was more in the mood for a sandwich so I stuck to the panini section of the menu. I decided to go with the prosciutto & mozzarella panini (with thinly sliced imported Italian Prosciutto di Parma, mozzarella cheese & sliced tomato) and a side of fries. My panini came ultra thin on crunchy bread. Even though the shell of the bread was hard, the inside with warm and soft with the thinly sliced prosciutto and mozzarella almost blending into a sauce. The fries were hot and crunchy but weren't anything special. However, with a side of their house caesar dressing (they didn't have ranch) they became a whole lot better. Our server was nice and took the time to talk to us as well as go over their menu at the beginning of the meal. I haven't spent that much time wandering around and testing the restaurants of University Ave, but Cafe Renzo was a nice place for a quick, filling lunch to build some calories before some serious shopping. I know I said "light" shopping earlier, but come on, is there really such a thing?
This place has a fitting name:  Ren-zo is only "so-so."  Came here for lunch today with 3 colleagues.  Thought we collectively tried a good cross-section of the menu. FOOD:  I got to sample the following: Bruschetta with tomatoes, basil, and olive oil on toasted bread ($7):  Fantastic bruschetta, perfectly toasted with a good crunch that wasn't tooth-shattering.   Tomatoes were ripe and slightly sweet.  And anyone who says anything bad about fresh basil is no friend of mine. Grilled portobello mushroom with sun-dried tomatoes, pinenuts, parmesan cheese and argula ($12):  Well-executed dish.  The pine nuts provided textural contrast to the mushroom, which was seasoned well but not overwhelmed by a balsamic vinegar that's all the rage these days. Dungeness crab cake with avocadoes and mashed potatoes ($13):  Generally tasty, but I think I prefer my crab cakes warm, thank you very much.  Also, the cake was prepared by sprinkling unadulterated crab meat on top of a potato base, which I found strange and almost Japanese in presentation -- don't be misled by the "cake" in the menu description, since the meat itself is naked and on top (dirty!). Salmon piccata ($19):  never had piccata prepared with salmon before this.  Salmon was seared well, if just a smidgen overdone.  Green beans and sauce were fine.  Imagine a chicken piccata but with a more delicate, flaky flesh. Chocolate souffle with vanilla ice cream ($7):  POSER ALERT.  What we received was NOT a souffle as I understand the term.  We were served a molten chocolate cake, not an egg custard with beaten egg whites folded in and baked to achieve significant rise.  Souffles, the delights of whimsy that they are, have to be served in the container they are baked in because they would otherwise collapse.  This "souffle" was a freestanding mound, with an outer surface so hard it would make a sound if tapped.  So, it barely qualified as a cake, much less a souffle.  :(  The ice cream was good, with vanilla bean seeds throughout. Bread was served right out of the oven, which is a plus, but the inside was a bit dense for my taste.  Where are the holes??  Not enough yeast, methinks. My colleagues tried the ravioli and the halibut, and were generally pleased with their dishes. SERVICE/AMBIANCE:  generally good, but VERY SLOW.  We placed the order for the "souffle" when we ordered the entrees, because the menu said it required 15 minutes advance notice.  Doing so did not seem to speed things up, as we still ended up waiting about 15 minutes after our entrees were cleared for the souffle to arrive.  The waiter also didn't bother asking us later if we wanted other desserts too, ones that didn't need 15 minutes advance notice.  Not really sure why ... The restaurant itself opens out to University (during lunch, at least) and thus has a very outdoorsy feel.  That was nice. OVERALL:  Food is good, but I felt misled at times.  Service needs some work.
Food = Amazing! Service = Fantastic! Ambiance = Wonderful! I came here for a ladies night with some friends. We were served by Sam, he was great the entire evening (and very easy on the eyes). I had the Mista salad (simple and delish) and for my meal I had Capellini al Pomodoro. For a usually simple pasta dish, I was amazed at how yummy this was. I dont recall what my ladies had but all four of them loved their dishes as well. For dessert, we ordered the Creme Brulee and Souffle al Cioccolato which were both amazing! Renzo (the owner) brought us a complimentary bottle of wine and an additional dessert. When we got our check, we found that all desserts and wine was on the house. Unbelievable customer service all night! I cannot wait to go back! In the meantime, I will tell anyone looking for a fantastic place to eat to try Cafe Renzo!
Really enjoyed our last minute decision. Only patio available but tables are tucked back and heaters kept us cosy. The food and service were great. Will def go again!
Excellent Service, wine list, and dinner menu..need I say more? I was pleasantly surprised by this place - the menu was so diverse and even though I did not have traditional Italian fare, my meal was fantastic. I can only imagine what the pasta dishes taste like! I will definitely be dining here again! The only drawback was that it felt a little chilly, so make sure to bring a sweater or light jacket.
Review is only for their drinks & service Their happy hour specials are great! that's why we went in $3 for beer, $4 wine and $5 cocktails. I got a cosmopolitan which was either really watered down cranberry juice or just straight up vodka. It tasted like cheap vodka and strong. I like my cocktails with at least some kind of favor. It's a neat place, the decorations/interior design are really pretty and would be a cool place to hang out at night. But yeah if you're going to go here for happy hour, pass the cocktails (appetizers weren't that bad) Service was definitely slow considering it was 530pm on a Sunday, with rarely any customers. (The bartender just likes to take his time, meh)
The portions are small, but the food is tasty. I've been here a few times with my friends and I loved the experience each time.  The first time I went, I had gotten the gnocci in a red sauce that I loved.  Sadly enough, the second time I came to Renzo, gnocci was no longer on the menu.  Instead, I decided to try their tortellini in red sauce which I found absolutely amazing.  The tortellini normally comes with a white sauce but I had them make it with the red sauce instead.  While he did cringe a bit about me changing the sauce, I was quite please with the choice since I was in love with the red sauce that came with it. Definitely my restaurant of choice in Palo Alto.
Went here last night to attend a special event featuring an upcoming tour of Southern Italy; they'd customized a menu for the event for $35/pp, complete with wine tastings (which we didn't know about from the website, so that was a nice surprise!). They started us off with an oblong plate featuring 3 small samples of:  Bruschetta, Caponata & Assorted Olives. Neither my husband or I like eggplant and had I not been sitting with the hosts of the event, and having just met the owner, I may have just skipped it, but I figured, what the hell, everyone does things differently.   I was amazed to look over and see my husband's Caponata gone - finito!   If you can take two Eggplant Haters and turn them, well, you know Renzo's pretty amazing!  (and he told me what the secret is to preparing good eggplant - just in case I want to start trying it!). Then onto Insalata di Arance; Baby Spinach Salad, Orange, garnished with Fennel and onions in a very light lemon dressing.  Normally this would be made with Blood Oranges, but they were not in season, and no Italilan chef is ever going to use something not in season!   It was delicious. Next up, Rigatoni Norma and a small portion of Risotto dei Pescatore - both yummy, and it was here where I "hit the wall". We still had Stufato di Carne Mista and Branzino Crusted with Pecans AND a Cannoli Siciliani.    I told our hostes that we needed to split the meat portion and she immediately notified the kitchen.   The Branzino was awesome, perfectly cooked. Thankfully, Cannoli was a smaller version that the size you're probably used to seeing, and even though I was lapsing into a Food Coma, I couldn't resist it. If you're looking for a true Italian experience, with authentic Italian food featuring a Scilian influence, a wonderful chef/owner, a family run business with Italian waiters, this is the place for you, and less expensive if you can't make it to Italy this year!
We were walking around University craving some pizza. We usually go to RoundTable and catch the Giants game there, but this time my wife wasn't really in a RoundTable kind of mood, although I love RoundTable Pizza, hehe. We decided to try out cafe Renzo since we walk by it so much but never tried it before. The place is gorgeous, of course part of the dining experience is the ambience, and Cafe renzo doesn't disappoint in that regard. The food was great particularly the appetizers (mussels, calamari etc). I had the artichoke/prosciutto pizza and an Italian blonde, awesome combo. Service was attentive, but not overly. A pleasant dining experience.
I go here all the time because the fresh baked rolls that you get while you're waiting for your food are yummy, the gnocchi is soooo pillowy-soft and good (I always get a different sauce though), and the Castle Rock syrah is good too. So dependable!
I think more than anything this restaurant is great for a first or second date, because on any given night it's quiet (so you'll really be able to enjoy the company of a friend) and the decor is really nice, which you'll notice upon entering Renzo. However, outside of the atmosphere and the fact that Renzo is family owned, I don't get that extra pizazz that great restaurants have. I think it may be the menu, in that it's a good menu but I'm not so sure about being "authentic." From my experience both the entree I ordered and service was OK, but nothing phenomenal. Perhaps, I'll give Renzo a second chance...and will come back with an update! We'll see... ;)
I had been wanting to try this place ever since it opened in the place of the former Madison & Fifth on University Ave. What a surprise upon walking in -- it's definitely a much larger space than it looks! And family owned, too? Nice! They serve complimentary warm dinner rolls made of a rustic type of bread. A plate of olive oil and balsamic is provided alongside for dipping. Normally I'd say fantastic, but the fact that these were dinner rolls and made of a slightly tougher consistency didn't gel with the dipping sauce. Butter would've been a better option, or changing the bread to a sliced version for easier dipping. For my main meal, I decided to choose two appetizer entrees. I ordered the bruschetta and the portobello alla griglia. Both dishes = mouthwateringly amazing!! The bruschetta was presented as a large chunk of tomato marinated in olive oil, sitting atop a fresh basil leaf, and on a olive oil brushed flatbread. Tasty!! The portobello arrived sitting atop a bed of arugula, tossed with sundried tomatoes and pine nuts...in other words, a salad. Just fantastic!! I couldn't skip dessert at an Italian restaurant, particularly when fellow Yelpers were raving about the cannoli here. My favorite cannoli's are on the East Coast, in Boston and New York. Cafe Renzo gave those spots a run for their money. What a fantastic cannoli! The shell was super crispy and tasted of a hint of vanilla. The filling inside was creamy, but not overly rich. We also ordered the tiramisu to share, since it's my all-time fav Italian dessert. So many restaurants do this concoction wrong, but Cafe Renzo succeeded. I tasted each of the layers and elements (including the rum), which made for a perfectly balanced tiramisu! What a great meal! I'd definitely return to sample some more of their Italian dishes.
Born and raised in Italy, I can say with certain confidence that Renzo is an excellent Italian restaurant and definitely my favorite in the South Bay so far. Everything on Renzo's menu is worth trying and many items are extraordinary, in particular the carbonara pasta. Their dishes are often ingeniously presented, like the crab pasta served inside a real crab shell. I love the fact that they offer different specials every week, so you can try something different every time.
This was my second time to Renzo, and I have to say that both experiences were not great.  The first time we sent back our drinks because they weren't made well, but we thought we would give it another chance. My second time there was even worse.   We say our server a total of three times.  My partners salad (a starter) came out 40 minutes into sitting down (right before his meal came).  We had to wait 15 minutes for our check to come, both asking for it and after giving our server the credit card.  Our water glasses were only filled once as well.  Drinks were late, food was late, and it made it a very long meal.  All in all, it was a bad experience.  From the way it looked, they were busy but needed much more staff there. The food wasn't bad for us, but the table next to us sent back a few dishes. I wouldn't recommend it on a busy night, thats for sure.
We were very disappointed at the quality of service and the quality of food.   It took a long time to get our Happy Hour order placed, got our wines and....and... no pizza.  Oops, 30 minutes later, here's your pizza.  Not very good pizza.   Asked for another glass of wine and was charged full price because happy hour had ended.  Where is the manager of this place?   The bill was adjusted which was what we would have expected.  But, if you're looking for an experience that meets your expectations, don't come here.   Yes, we've experienced MUCH better elsewhere.   Save your dough.  Make Happy Hour Happy, not mediocre.    Yes, service is AWFUL.  Are the owners listening?
I'll start out by saying, my review is for the happy hour.  I haven't eaten dinner there yet, because I love Pizza Margherita and it is on the happy hour menu!  Yay!  The cocktails are really good, the wine is ok.  That being said, what should I expect when the wine is $4?  :)  The ambiance is terrific, and the folks that work at the bar are exceptionally nice.  They are friendly and attentive without being pushy or overbearing.  Every time I have been there, the owner was there and seemed genuinely interested in making sure the patrons are happy.  I love going to places where the owners put their heart into their work.  It does seem to rub off on the guests.  Every time I have been, it has seemed that everyone at the bar is really enjoying themselves.
I ate here on a slow Tuesday night while participating in a seminar at Stanford. I like traditional Italian restaurants that dish up good standard old favorites without completely lapsing into cliches, and which carry things off with some professionalism and panache.  That was Renzo's. First, in contrast to the experiences some have reported on here, the service was extremely attentive, professional, responsive, and well-paced.  (And my waiter was apparently actually from Sicily.)  I had a lovely small, round cafe table outside that actually felt a bit like sitting in a sidewalk restaurant in Italy. I appreciated that they give you a carafe of water. Overhead heaters made it comfortable on a damp, cool night. Bread rolls with a side dish of olive oil and balsamic appeared right away. (Why, though, can't places like this play some authentic vintage Italian music, perhaps mixed with some Sinatra, Tony Bennett, and Jerry Vale?  Even an Andrea Bocelli CD would be better than banal pop.) I had a caprese salad, risotto frutti di mare, a glass of vermentino, chocolate mousse, and an espresso "corretto" -- espresso with a dash of sambuca. Caprese salad is available anywhere, of course.  This one, if not memorable, was fine. Tomatoes were ok -- a bit above par for restaurant caprese, though not exceptionally ripe or flavorful. Nice creamy mozzarella, lots of fresh basil. The risotto was a pleasure, if for no reason other than it's so hard to find a seafood risotto, much less a well made one.  This one had ample shrimp, calamari, whole clams and mussels.  I might have preferred a lighter hand on the tomato sauce, but it was well incorporated and contributed to a deep, concentrated flavor in the overall dish. The mousse was wonderful -- rich, dense, verging on something like a ganache,  more milk chocolate than dark chocolate, served with a lot of real whipped cream. Renzo's appeared to have a nice wine list with lots of interesting selections by the glass. The Argiolas Costamolino vermentino was bold and substantial, complex, interesting, and different -- deep yellow, fruity and creamy/minerally at the same time. Check out the writeup on http://wine.com -- "beautifully delineated" describes it well. Finally, when you can order a corretto -- an espresso "corrected" with a thimbleful of sambuca, grappa, or brandy -- you know that whoever's in charge isn't just running a restaurant; he's someone who understands what it means to finish off a good meal with just a little something special, like you would do if entertaining at home.  Many Italian places will sell you a snifter or small tumbler of some sort of after dinner drink, which is usually too much, too expensive, and throws things off balance.  The corretto was the perfect end to a really satisfying meal. Price seemed fair and in line with other places on toney University Avenue. This was one meal where I settled up the tab and left a good tip with no regrets or reservations.
Have been for lunch and for drinks after work  It's pretty good Italian food and a nice alternative to Il Fornaio.
WHAT I ORDERED: "Anatra all'Arancio" - seared duck breast topped with caramelized onions and orange reduction sauce - $21.00 WHAT I GOT: an inedible luke-warm duck breast BLUE RARE inside (gelatinous and transparent and unchewable). The chef didn't seem to understand how to properly sear meat, or he thought that it involves a hair dryer. (It should have been RARE/MEDIUM RARE inside = soft, yet edible). WHAT THEY DID: I sent it back, asking for the chef to "sear it a little more." In an act of vengeance, the duck was returned to me WELL DONE. Dicks. If you're going to offer this as an entree, have someone on hand who knows how to cook. THE REST: *The Service: good, polite *Ambiance: pleasant *Menu Selection: good *The Chef Who Cooked My Meal: dick
I gave this place two stars simply because on a Friday night at 8PM, it is not okay for an ITALIAN restaurant to be out of pizza dough.  Essentially, half the items listed on the menu could no longer be ordered.  No one wants to go to a restaurant and not be able to order what you want...and I wanted pizza dammit.
I am a fancy person lol , Downtown Palo Alto is my favorite spot, ton of good place for eat and drink, Cafe Renzo is on my list, I been there many times and it's only for happy hour, Love the cocktail Lemon Drop, those finger food on the menu taste good for me. and I don't think it's pricy for the happy hour. The bartender is a funny person , he told me I better yelp about him lol , he is young, funny and talkable person, if you be solo there(even you are man or woman), you won't feel bore lol
Stopped by here on the way home, used a http://restuarant.com gift certificate, no hassle.  The service was slow, friendly though, no issues.  We ordered a couple of pizza's, they came out quick, seemed a little on the cool side, which is odd.  Anyways, I liked my pizza, the others seemed to like them both as well.  Don't think I would go back, I wanted to get pasta, but all the pasta dishes seemed very basic.
Though I have not sat down to "dine" here per se (stay tuned for updates), I was attracted by the everyday Happy Hour (Sun-Sun 4PM-7PM) one Sunday afternoon whilst bustling around the promenade checking out our future neighborhood. My Dirty Martini was perfect! I had 3 of them (at $5 happy hour price), and then went on for a Pizza which I split with the GF.  Wow, what a great little snack!  I was so excited I posted up a picture too. The bartender was also very engaging and helpful.  I think (if we move to Palo Alto, and after subsequent more visits) that this will be my after work 2nd office!  "I'll have another dirty martini, please."
Renzo had me at mozzarella. If you are into caprese salads - this was the most flavorful, creamy mozzarella ever, along with the freshness of the tomato - it was a winner. I could have eaten it by myself times x 2 - it was that delicious (Next time I'm trying the burrata!). The beef carpaccio was also an excellent appetizer - I would definitely get this appetizer again. Tried the beef tortelloni - nice melding of flavors. Mushrooms and beef are like peanut butter and jelly - they just go together. Had the ossobuco - it was very rich, delicious - but nothing seemed to compare with the caprese salad. Still thinking about that mozzarella cuz I'm going to take a friend there who is single focused on caprese salads...I know she will love it... As far as desserts - had to have the cannoli which had the traditional ricotta cheese filling. You can tell they make their own desserts - a big plus. Nothing is worse in a nice upscale restaurant getting some frozen concoction from some distributor. All in all, if I had to name a favorite Italian restaurant - Renzo would be it - they have a menu that is pretty substantial without being overwhelming meaning it has about anything I would be craving that's Italian...and a nice bar for those who just want to hang. We loved our waiter - he was great. We got our food in a timely manner with no hitches.
I had been asked to attend the evening functions for my VP's 4 day conference and Cafe Renzo was the first restaurant we went to.  The atmosphere is fine, nothing special or atypical, and for the amount of people that we had, 17, we didn't have a separate area that was really functional. The seating arrangement cut off people from being able to leave the table smoothly, chairs had to be added in at the last minute, etc.  We had one waiter that took all of the orders, and bless his soul, he did the best he could given our large party and hardly missed a beat, all while being patient and keeping a cordial attitude. The food...was ok.  Again, nothing spectacular or extraordinary, but the price at the end of the night was something that would have made someone do a double take, I know my VP definitely did.  The wine selection was fine, and the waiter did his best to keep up with our need to have bottles replenished in addition to other drinks requested. Although there wasn't anything major wrong with them, I am not recommending Cafe Renzo again to my VP at our next event in October, I'm just glad I had not been the one to suggest Cafe Renzo.  :)
Had a quick lunch at this joint, and here is what I think... Place was clean and quiet (not that many tables were seated); food was not bad; soup was not enough. Though, I kinda sensed a dirty look from this waiter when my friend and I didn't order drinks but regular water.
I visited this restaurant with a couple of friends. We ordered some beers (Moretti) and 3 pizze (margherite). The beers were good and the pizze were yummy. The place itself is nice and classy. The only problem is that it tends to get noisy. The menu is pricey. The waiter was nice and helpful. The guys that bring bread and olive oil do not listen to what you say, either because they don't understand or they don't care. I asked for extra bread and it never arrived. I just wished I could tip waiter and busser separately. The highlight of the place is pizza. The downside is the service. I think Cafe Renzo earns 4 stars but I'd give 3.5 if I could.
We were disappointed. This place is family friendly and the food is so-so. But the service was so bad you should stay away. Our waiter had no sense of timing, and our food arrived in jumbled order. We ordered wine by the glass and the waiter brought it as we were finishing our food - so we had none while we were eating. My husband asked for a condiment and they said yes, then simply did not bring it. There is a reason it's easy to get a table there.
I have walked by this place for quite awhile.  Tried going in a couple of times but the wait was too long.  About three weeks ago I went here with a group of 4 and was seated right away. The entre experience was wonderful.  Excellent Italian Waiter, Well Timed Food, Warm Rolls, great wine.  Rally good time.  5 Star. About a week later, went by with another friend, who also had walked by, but never stopped.  We had Pizza a and Angel-Hair Pasta dishes.  Again a really positive experience- 5 Star. A week Later went by with as a group of two.  1-Star-Sorry! Food did not taste good.  Soft Shell Crab was really 'fishy", not good at all-did not eat.  The Pizza was burned (not just the edges, but bottom was black) and it was cold.  Service was slow.  I was really surprised.  This was a Tuesday evening (the day before Renzo's one-year in business part).  If this was my first experience I would never return.  Even the dinner rolls seemed like they were a day-old.  Really bad. I will go back, since the first two experiences we so good.  May be it was related to the waiter, since the first two visits i was lucky enough to get the same italian waiter (sorry I will get this name if I see him again).  I hope it is excellent Again, the next time I go.
Not disappointed at all, this being my 3rd trip here.  This time, with a group of 7 and service was great. They were very accommodating and friendly.   We also brought our own wine but they do have a corkage fee ($18 per bottle). Overall, food was good.  Our family is carniverous so we ordered entrees of veal, lamb, and pork chops as opposed to the classic pasta dishes. Our appetizers were delicious.  The calamari was cooked perfectly tender. My osso bucco was nice and flavorful, but perhaps a tad overcooked. The saffron risotto was a little under-seasoned but not bad. My cousin said her lamb was 5 stars, but my boyfriend said his lamb was a bit overcooked though still well seasoned.  My other cousin sent back her stuffed pork chop bc she said it was way over done, so they re-cooked it and she liked it the second time around.  My mom rated her linguini con vongole as 8 out of 10. One thing's for sure, the portions are plentiful and you won't walk away hungry. They also gave my dad a nice piece of tiramasu for his birthday with a candle to blow it. Overall: a solid italian restaurant with a variety of options to satisfy everyone.
We had a very good experience here on a Friday night.  We were seated right away by the windows that... Read more 
This place just gets better and better as they hit their stride. This has become one of my favorite places to eat in Palo Alto. There is always someone fun and lively at the bar to chat with, and the tables seem to be packed no matter what time of day. Last Tuesday I almost couldn't get in! I'm currently loving on their Filet Gorgonzola. Its a piece of filet wrapped in pancetta with a smoky gorgonzola sauce on top. This dish is literally mouth-watering. And $24 for a steak is pretty reasonable in downtown P.A. Tried the chocolate souffle last time and it was okay. A little on the dry side, which was a shame. I'll definitely be sticking with my fave creme brulee next time. Overall experience though, gets better each time!
Stopped into Renzo's for lunch today and was quite surprised. I had already visited this spot a... Read more 
This was our first stop during the Palo Alto Dishcrawl with Yelp last night. Of the dishes we sampled, I can't decide which one was my favorite: the gnocchi or the pizza margherita. The waiters are extremely friendly and helpful. And I love the ambience of the place. Definitely anticipate coming here again the next time I'm in Palo Alto.
I liked this place, has a sitting area for people waiting for a table. The service was a little slow, my guess is they're still getting used to it since they just opened recently. Calzone Mezzaluna ricotta, Italian ham, mushrooms with light marinara sauce. Tagliolini Mare Monte homemade tagliolini with fresh wild mushrooms & black tiger prawns. The calzone was huge though, good enough for 2 people. It had a bit too much dough but the I swear the pasta  was amazing. Good environment, huge booths. Very private, very intimate. Has an open space outside too, not as big but good enough to see the University Ave traffic or gawk at the Apple store customers outside. It's perfect for a  nice warm evening with beautiful company.
Out of the short lived ashes of Loui Loui Steak comes Cafe Renzo which is owned by a very friendly Sicilian family. Back in the day it was Giovanni and family across the street at the very missed Palermo (Giovanni moved to Sacramento to be near his children). I've been looking for a long time for a great new Italian restaurant in the area and although there are a lot of them, none of them filled that void. Donato in Redwood City may have come the closest up to this point but that's still a bit far for me to call my neighborhood joint. Although definitely fancier than what Palermo used to be, the amiable personality of everyone in the restaurant has made a good impression. More importantly the food has also turned out to be very good. Three of us had the following: -Minnestrone soup -Spinach Salad -Bruschetta -Rigatoni Puttanesca -Gnocchi with Gorgonzola -Coniglio (rabit) with caramelized onions and tomato As noted, everything was solid. Palermo's Puttanesca had Sea Bass and linguine which had a certain flair to it but I found a lot of the familiar flavors here from the nice bursts of salinity from the anchovy and olives. Rabbit is a particularly tricky meat to get correct and my plate was braised just enough to get the meat tender and not tough or mushy. The sauce however was super tasty and you could have added it to just about anything and make it taste good. The gnocchi and other dishes were noted by my friend to all be great. Our server Graziano was very friendly and attentive as was the rest of the staff. The chef came out and even his mother, who everyone referred to as "Mama" through out the night made the rounds. I found out at the end of the evening they carry an assortment of Amaro which very few Italian joints have , so we had a round as a nightcap. Definitely coming back for some of my other staples such as linguine vongole to see how the rest of the menu holds up. Let's say I'm very hopeful that this may slip into Palermo's old position. 4.25 stars.
This was stop number two on girls night  and where we had salad/soup and wine. I had a mimosa, which was basically champagne with just a splash of orange juice - just how I like it. I ordered the ceasar salad - pretty standard, nothing too fancy. But if a restauarant messed up ceasar salad, there'd be something terribly wrong, right? The roommates had butternut squash soup and minestrone soup. Both of which they loved. The generous portions and attentive servers will keep us coming back.
Went there on Sunday for the Palo Alto Art Festival with my girl friends. Since we all have a early brunch, we felt hungry around 3pm and the resturant happen to be right in front of us. It also happened that their daily happy hour start at 3pm which is a plus for us. :) We ordered the calarmari ($7, happy hour price) as appetizer. For main dishes, we had angel hair pasta and calzone. The agnel hair pastas ($8) is sooooooo delicious, so far is the best I have had. The Calzone with eggplant, basil and mozzarella cheese. It is HUGE!! Qote from my friend "it is bigger than her head" which I cannot agree, but I do think it's pretty much of same size as her head. We love their seating area near the sidewalk with their door wide open, it gave us a welcome atmosphere.
My friend Lisa and I had a great experience at Renzos.  We ordered homemade pastas; I had gnocchi and Lisa had tortelloni.  Amazing both dishes!  The atmosphere was nice, cozy, and the waiter was a bambino molto gentile e simpatico.  I can't wait to try those gnocchi again! Lisa, when are we coming back to Renzos?!!
I went here for brunch a few Sundays ago.  The food was good.  However, the service was lacking.  There were only a few tables occupied in the entire restaurant.  Yet, it took forever to get our beverages and food. That's probably why they were so empty while many of the restaurants around them were fully packed.  Prices were average.
What a lovely patio seating area. We didn't actually sit there during dinner, but we sat in one of the tables closest to the big open window to the sidewalk. We couldn't have asked for better weather and service. The restaurant was nice and definitely a little fancy, but something about the food did not quite hit the spot... croquette The potato croquettes were not as big as I thought and the filling wasn't as soft as I hoped because each little croquette was an oval ball and I guess it was more overfried than I wanted. cioppino The cioppino was delicious, but it was also much too oily and salty, which is probably why it was so dang addicting. I loved the seafood parts of course, though there was no crab, which is integral to cioppino!! spaghetti alla carbonara The pasta didn't look like much as first when it arrived, but it incredibly filling because it was pasta after all. The white creme sauce was good and I liked that it was drier than other pasta dishes with sauce. pizza alla norma This was a great deal because it was the more cheaper items on the menu, though it was a large personal pizza. It was more than enough food. The pizza was thin crust and it was freshly baked.
My first time here was for my Sister's Birthday.  It was not super packed, so I wasn't sure what to expect at first.  It was relatively new so I figured I'd keep my fingers crossed.  I ordered the Seafood Risotto and it was AMAZING!  It is now one of my new favorite italian restaurants.  The old Coppola restaurant was cool, and now this is back to what it should be.  I think they have a wine happy hour as well, which I might have to check out sometime. Great food, good ambience, awesome service
I hate to hate, but lucky for Cafe Renzo I was more mixed than hate here. My wife and I met up with three good friends on a school night. We were seated in the back of the restaurant at a nice table where we were able to hear ourselves talk and catch up. Water and bread was immediately bought over. But our server was not the best and did not make it over to our table for a bit. And we were a thirsty crowd! But finally he did make his way over and took our drink orders. We started with cocktails. My Makers Mark sidecar was good and refreshing. But once our drinks were finished we felt a little neglected and it took a while before our server came back to check in on us. The food was fine. Yes, just fine. It was very much hit and miss. My wife and I started with the carpaccio. This was nice appetizer which included a healthy portion of shaved parmesan and lightly drizzled with olive oil. My main however was not quite as delicious. I spotted the spaghetti carbonara and went with it. My experience with carbonara dishes are either they can be kick butt out of this world, or just "meh". This one was sadly the latter and left me regretting getting it. And this after our server commenting that theirs was one of the best around. The spaghetti was cooked to al dente which I like, but even this bacon lover knows when there is too much of a good thing. In my opinion there was way too much pancetta in the dish and the result being it was just simply too salty. Two of our friends each got the pork chop which looked it was good and something I would probably get next time. The wine list is a win with lots of nice bottles priced under $50. We chose two bottles of Rosenblum petite sirah Heritage Clones reasonably priced at $42. And if you are into Italian wine, then you will love their list as they include many selections from the old world. Since our experience was mixed, we opted to pass on dessert there and headed down the street to the Cheesecake Factory, which by the way was also not the greatest. But that is a different review for a another time.
Excellent Sicilian cuisine, good service, very accomodating, lovely bar and ambience, love the orange salad and many other things
Pretty good italian food.  The fried calamari is so good! I definitely ordered the wrong pasta dish (the broccolini shell pasta), though.  My friends had much better plates (stroganoff beef pasta and the pancetta pink sauce pasta). Even with the wrong dish, I do love the service and atmosphere here.  The first time I came to Cafe Renzo, Renzo, the owner and chef, came out and hung out with us at the bar.  There was also an older gentleman there (not sure who he was?) who comped us with some biscottini because we were enjoying ourselves so much. I'll come back next time and try something different.  That was a fluke.  If it happens again I'll update the entry accordingly!
I like this place.  I've passed it multiple times and wondered what its like.  Last night, Caltrain decided to bitch slap my regularly scheduled electric guitar lesson, stella drinking Wednesday night, by delaying my train for an agonizingly long time.  I don't play that...since I am attention deficit theatre girl. So, I decided, toddle on down University Ave with Miss Violet (my bicycle) and find a joint for a nice glass of red wine and a bite to eat.  I stopped in here, called a friend to come meet me and bellied up to the bar for Roso vino. The hostess was lovely to me, despite not having a reservation.  The barter, a very cute blond man with long hair an a beautiful Latin accent suggested a glass of primitivo.  Delicious, good recommendation. There were a ouple of old dues in the lounge/bar area and they saw my guitar case and chatted me up, really fun way to kill a half hour. My friend showed up, we ordered two more glasses of red and he got the bruschetta (yum) and I ordered the margherita pizza.  Super yum. Good service, tasty food, nice ambiance, ( we sat outside since it was a lovely balmy November evening).  I even ran into some other friends there, which made it feel like one of my hangouts... I will come back.
I came tonight with a party of 8 to celebrate a birthday.  I made a reservation a few days in advance, and they had reserved a nice long table in the back of the restaurant which felt separate from the rest of the restaurant.  Very nice ambiance, with beautiful interior design and lit candles. They started with some delicious warm bread rolls served with olive oil and balsamic vinegar.  Bread's definitely my weakness, and it was so good that I had almost 2 pieces of it.  I ordered the Tagliolini Mare Monte pasta which had mushrooms and prawns in it.  It was good, but the pasta was a little undercooked for me.  The prawns were large and tasted pretty fresh.  I also tried some of their Gnocchi al Gorganzola, which was also good, but a little too much cheese for me.  Everyone else at the table seemed to really enjoy their meal. We didn't try any of their desserts since we brought our own birthday cake.  Unfortunately they have a $1.50 per person cake cutting fee, but this sems pretty common for most restaurants on University Ave.  So far the only place that I know of without a cake cutting fee in the area is Crepevine. I would definitely go back and try some of their other dishes, but as of now, I'm craving some pasta from Osteria.  I think their homemade pasta tastes much better, and their sauces tend to be very flavorful but light at the same time.
My wife and I had our wedding rehearsal dinner here this January and it was such an amazing experience!  Renzo was super accommodating in putting together the menu for the guests, he even added items to our menu that aren't offered on the regular menu. (AMAZING cake!) The price was very reasonable considering the size of our party, quality (and quantity!) of our food and the amount of wine ordered. The servers were incredibly amicable and very attentive, as was Renzo, who made sure that we were satisfied with everything.  My gnocchi were perfectly fluffy and flavorful and my wife's carbonara was really great. The room is very nice and it made for a fantastic dinner (Around 30 guests).  I would recommend Cafe Renzo to anyone!
I am usually reluctant to stop in at a new place on University Ave for lunch because I don't feel like spending $30 for a sandwich or a salad. However, I found myself wandering on University ave on Monday afternoon with a growling tummy, so I met a friend for lunch at Renzo's. While scanning the menu, I was very surprised by the prices. A steak panini and soup or salad was only $11! I decided I was in more of a pasta mood, so I ordered the Gnocchi al Gorganzola. Holy cheese sauce, Batman! This was HANDS DOWN the tastiest pasta dish I have ever had! Creamy, cheesey, and the pasta was so fresh it melted in your mouth. I can't wait to go back and try some of the other dishes!
I think the food here is just great. We've been here about 4 times now. I usually get a pasta dish and he usually gets a pizza or calzone. The bread/pizza is all homemade and delicious. The pizza crust has a great flavor and texture to it - nice and savory. The pasta dishes that I have gotten have always been stellar- the Gorgonzola gnocchi, the spaghetti carbonara, and some mushroom-sauce pasta. The carbonara is so freaking good. The Gorgonzola pasta is soooo rich and delicious. The portions are also huge. A little too huge, actually. I got three meals out of the carbonara. I love leftovers, but you don't want to devalue the dishes by giving you too much! The salads are a nice, generous portion and I highly recommend the spinach salad. I tried the butternut squash soup last night, which was good, but was honestly more like a puree. It was super thick, but really flavorful! The one thing that bothers me about this place is that the service is always a little off. I've had one really good server here and three bizarro servers here. The three weird server incidents included: the server demanding our order about 10 seconds after sitting down, bringing the wrong beer, wanting to clear plates too soon, not clearing the salad plates when the entrees came- things like that. Nothing horrific, but just carelessness. But nothing to make me not come back. Renzo's is one of my new go-to Italian places. EDIT: I've been here two times since I wrote this review. The food remains great. However, I keep getting this waiter that is just so awful- the same that I mentioned above. He marches up to the table, no greeting, doesn't ask for drink or even appetizer orders. Just barks, "ARE YOU READY TO ORDER?!" No, I am not ready to order yet because I sat down 30 seconds ago. Sending him away after say, no I need time to look at the menu, he comes back a couple minutes later, so I'm forced to order my drink, appetizer and entree, all in the same sentence. He's such a crappy waiter, focused on rushing us out quickly and not giving any sort of nice dining experience.
So-so food delivered with so-so service under so-so lighting. Octopus carpaccio - bland, until you get to the oily part in the middle, and then it's passable. At least it tastes healthy. Butternut squash soup - also bland. Veal Marsala - not bad! I like the parmesan cheese on the asparagus. Tiramisu - more chocolate-y than I expected, didn't have the stomach for any more after my first mini-slice. Want to live forever? Try asking for the bill, it takes an eternity.
Based on the high reviews, I went out with a group of friends.  Our waiter was very polite and helpful.  The food was good.  We had a Portobello alla Griglia appetizer.  Note that their appetizers are small and really only meant for one person.  I had Coniglio alla Cacciatora which is rabbit stew.  It was tender and well seasoned.  Others had pasta dishes which they really enjoyed.  We finished off the meal with a chocolate souffle for dessert which hit the spot.  Throw in a glass of "Super Tuscan" wine and we had a good meal. I'm not sure why people say this is an "intimate" and "romantic" restaurant.  It is nice, but it was also loud with many large groups.  We felt like we had to shout at each other to hold a conversation at our small table.  I liked the energy and it is classy, but not very romantic.
We went here for a late lunch on a sunny Sunday. We sat at a table that was partly inside and partly outside. We ordered the bruschetta first and it was delicious! Then I ordered the fruitti di mare, which he stole chunks of! He got a tortelini or ravioli I don't remember but he ate that up pretty quick. I wasn't a fan of my server at all. He never introduced himself or even said hi. He more just took our orders and never came back until he dropped the bill; which surprised me because he only had one other table the majority of the time.  The food and drinks did take some time to get to our table also. Either way, it was such a relaxing day and the atmosphere of the place made it extra pleasant. Although the food was good, I think it was a little over priced since I've had the same thing for $10 less. However, that's what I get for going to the Palo Alto area! It was worth it for a such a nice afternoon. I would go back to try something new on the menu.
I tried the cannoli: http://www.yelp.com/biz_... It is excellent: not too sweet, nice crunchy shell (but not too hard), and the candied orange peel is a great accent.  $6. I would say it's superior to both Romolo's cannoli (San Mateo), and La Biscotteria (Redwood City). Also be sure to try the house-infused limoncello. http://www.yelp.com/biz_... ** They no longer offer the Sfogliatelle.  Major bummer. ** They have a staff of native Italian waiters.
My family and i were in a bind to find a place that would seat 17 immediately. i called Cafe Renzo and they were happy to accommodate us. we just had a short walk down the street to get there and by the time we arrived we were kindly greeted and sat at a beautiful table. the service was great and the food was delicious! there was something on the menu to please everyone (which says a lot to a bunch of Italians). the serving sizes were great and so was the price. i would totally recommend this place to my friends and i definitely plan on going back myself! (just a side note, if you are a wine snob you might want to bring your own. the wine selection isn't built for the high end wine drinker.)
I just attended a Dishcrawl at this restaurant and the food was great! I especially liked the thin crust pizza. Nice atmosphere and friendly staff. Will definitely bring my co-workers here again! Perfect stop for a Dishcrawl :)
Came here on a weekend night.  Food was so-so.  Same with service and atmosphere.  Tried the appetizer with crab and mashed potatoes -- potatoes are served cold, which wasn't what we expected.  OK but not terribly flavorful.  Gnocchi was pretty good, but the sauce was nothing to write home about.  Fish was OK. There are better places to go for Italian on the peninsula, and certainly in the city.  I'd try somewhere else before I'd come back here.
Amazing service, atmosphere and cuisine!!!  This is definitely a place to celebrate with large parties or have an intimate dinner... I would eat here every day if possible!!! :)
I'd be back for the Osso Bucco or the Gnocchi, decent date spot and they didn't seem too full so a good last-minute choice.
Great ambiance, $$, average food... I'm not sure why this place gets soooo busy on the weekend. The food is just ok. The food is better at Oesteria.
I often walk by this place and notice that there aren't very many people in this place. This is a typical Palo Alto restaurant full of yuppies!  Nice place and the food was pretty good.  I ordered the Pollo Parmigiano nothing really out of the ordinary.  In fact the restaurant itself was really nothing out of the ordinary. It wasn't bad at all but I just didn't see anything special about this place.  Just OK in my opinion.
WOW! If you want to step into a wonderful Italian, well, to be exact, a Sicilian experience, step into Cafe Renzo on University in Palo Alto. The cuisine is a little different than other parts of Italy, yummielicious!!! What a wonderful adventure in eating and people from the moment you walk through the door to the time you kiss your waiter on both cheeks and walk out. Seating outside is a fantastic treat, especially when the weather is good but even if not, the heaters or the awesome wine selection keeps you warm. I love that the service is not rush, rush, rush! In Italy, you take your time and enjoy the LIFE,  and what is life without good food?  Speaking of good food, you got it here! From the just plain honest hug of the Minestrone Soup or the fresh Mozzarella in the Caprese Salad which cuts like butter and even the tomatoes (I don't like tomatoes) are pleasing to the palate. Awesome Salmon Piccata on a bed of Green Beans (ah, no guilt) followed by a good to the last drop cup of Espresso to be enjoyed along with a slice of Tiramisu and I don't much like Tiramisu much either. However, at Cafe Renzo, I ate the tomatoes and tried  the Tiramisu and was delighted!  Anyway, if you want all the above and much, much more, give Cafe Renzo a try. I know I will be returning and recommending it to all my family, co-workers and friends. I am also considering a couple of corporate events there. I know they have them.  I worked for a catering company for 14 years and cooking is a hobby of mine and I love all of Italy. MOLT0 BENE!!
The pizza. This review is for the pizza only. OMG If you grew up with East Coast pizza you have to have this. The crust is  charred on the bottom, chewy in the middle, with the doughy bubbles in the center....The sauce and cheese are really good. I tried six(!) really? (Okay over several visits)  pizzas before writing this review and I can confidently say. I heartily endorse this pizza. I am eating a slice as I write. Very close to Santarpio's or Regina's. very close I said, not exactly, so don't hunt me down if you don't agree. Just sayin, I got street cred and I say it ROCKS!!!
I love Italian food and I love Bruschetta! This place makes an unbelievable one- The freshly roasted tomatoes were so sweet and tasted as if it were picked in the back garden and grilled to perfection. As for the white sauce Gnocchi it was homemade and was good as well. I would only caution that it is rich and heavy but if it's one of those days where you don't care or if you're sharing dishes, it's perfect.
Not too impressed with this place. The location and service was great, but the food was blah. I have had much better Italian food elsewhere. The best part of my meal was the ceasar salad.
We have been going to Renzo's for some time now, even before the grand opening. Quite often we find ourselves walking downtown trying to find some new place to eat at and usually end up back at Renzo's. We love the atmosphere and how they always try to get you exactly what you want. The food is always good and priced well. It is my wife's favorite place. So, if your looking for some good Italian food. A nice family atmosphere. And to be treated like you really matter. Then this is the place to go.
Pretty standard Italian fare and relatively friendly service. The calamari was nice and crisp but nothing too special. The steak was tender but needed salt and pepper. It's pretty inside and nice place to catch up with girlfriends but there are better places to eat down the street.
The only thing good about this place is the relaxed bistro-style patio seating. Everything else is bad. The capellini pomodoro was heavy on the  sauce and very garlicky, and just not good quality pasta. The caprese mozzarella was soft and floppy. Service was alright. Overall, I prefer Osteria for the food. But if you need a nice place to people watch, I guess this place is ok.
Great venue for a group of friends celebrating a birthday. Quality dishes: the simple and fresh calamari, generously portioned caprese, perfectly textured spinach ravioli, and cooked to spec ribeye steak. The cheese platter was nice, but didn't lively up the meal in the way we were expecting; the sweet accompaniments were so cloyingly sweet that none of the cheeses were sharp enough to balance then out. The free bread with balsamic and oil while you wait is amazing :) This doesn't affect my rating, but ladies note that one of the waiters is really winky.
Second time definitely not a charm! We ate here a few months back and it was great, but our recent experience was lacking in almost all respects. After being seated, it took quite a while before anyone came to wait on us.  Then, strangely, after that the waiter was overattentive! He would hover (to the point of making us feel uncomfortable) and when I got near the bottom of a drink (still some left mind you) he would try to take it away from me!  Then when it came time for the check, he was nowhere to be found and we eventually had to get up and go find someone. As for the food...not nearly as good as the first visit.  Everything seemed very bland and not even remotely fresh. So it seems that consistency may be their biggest challenge.
My wife and I eat at the same two Italian places all the time (Carpaccio and Osteria) but wanted to... Read more 
We go here for pizza or calzone. Pros: - Reasonably priced - Good location - Never crowded - Friendly restaurant staff - Good pizza and calzone - Good chocolate souffle - Great french fries Cons: - Most pasta dishes are ok. Just avoid pasta dishes that has "bread crumbs" in it. I had to send it back because it was so awful. - Service is usually very slow - Takes forever to get your check - Big portion - You can smell the cigar from the cigar shop across the street sometimes. I've seem multiple guests complaining about the smell - Green salad = not so fresh. Something to avoid
wine list was great, bartender was sweet and had a marvelous time. I was eyeballing the food so i will be back soon to experience!
A friend and I were in Palo Alto a couple of weekends ago and decided to drive down University Ave and pick a place to have lunch.  This place looked French from the tables and chairs outside, and we didn't look at the name of the place - we assumed we were going into a French restaurant and so we were slightly surprised to discover it was Italian.  Still we both like Italian food so we stayed.  As an earlier review mentioned - it's not a good sign when there are only 2-3 other full tables - and this was true that day.  We should have bailed out then. I ordered the Gamberi - baby spinach & goat cheese topped with prawns in warm lemon dressing.  It was the strangest combination of flavors and it was not good. My friend who is vegetarian ordered Zuppa di Zucca - homemade butternut squash soup with dolce latte gorgonzola cheese and despite asking if the base was vegetable or chicken, she was assured it was vegetable.  She woke up the next day feeling very unwell, so we suspect it was not vegetable.  The service was average at best. The waiter tried to use Italian charm, but honestly it felt like he wasn't listening to us and wasn't particularly interested in us. There are plenty of GREAT restaurants in Palo Alto - choose another one.
Dish Crawl is a wonderful new discovery and how I ended up at this place on a Tuesday night. This was our kick-off spot. The staff was very gracious and friendly - in spite of the amount of room our group took up. Ordered a glass of wine as we got organized - HUGE pour! Sampled: Gorgonzola gnocchi, slice of margarita pizza and a "reconstructed" bruschetta (grilled flat bread with piece of basil topped by an oven roasted tomato. All 3 were good (plating was very pretty as well), but the bruschetta was my favorite - a pretty perfect couple of bites. Service makes this place worth another visit to sample more of their menu.
Great food! Excellent service. Renzo and Mario are the best and they are real Italian. Can't wait to be back!
My first and last experience at this place made me want to call in a burglary - I felt robbed. My friends and I came here for a hot birthday celebration that was lukewarm at best. We had a blast with each others' company but the food and service was really quite bad. Where to start ... The service was painfully slow with only us to be served by 3 busboys and 2 waiters. They weren't even closed when they decided to sort their silverware and dishes, LOUDLY, right behind us. The bill took forever to come and the fake Italian waiter - along with a few 'older' wiseguy types - would not stop hitting on us. The food took over 45 minutes to get to us. When it did, I wanted to walk out. They messed up on orders, the food was cold ... chicken parm: how does a chef mess up this most basic dish? By using Ragu on a piece of frozen poultry that was beaten within an inch of its life. Tough, tasteless, tacky. Depressing. The bad food and service would have been enough. But then came the cheesy fake Italian waiter bringing us MULTIPLE bottles of $100 wine without offering the price tag up front - at least point it out on the menu as you're recommending it. Even a thief tells you he's robbing you up front, it's the only decent thing to do. Sound harsh? Try getting a $500 bill at the end of a horrendous dinner. We met the owner/manager at the end of the evening and he seems like a nice enough guy .. maybe we should call Gordon Ramsey to come wake him up to the potential he has with this place. It's sad that it's being run so poorly and, judging by the reviews, doesn't seem to be changing. I'll come back when it's under new management who cares about service, quality, and class.
An enjoyable, satisfying, casual place to eat. The more I come here, the more I enjoy the ambiance and food. They have great sidewalk seating, the space is open with intimate tables and booths, and the food -- consistent, decent italian. Really enjoyed the beef ravioli with a relatively light mushroom cream sauce. The beef carpaccio with arugula is my fav. I love coming here on Friday nights, having a glass of wine, eating comfort food, and just relaxing. Unlike other places, it's not loud and bopping. We usually end up in a conversation with someone at a nearby table; something about the atmosphere just makes that easy. The service - excellent. Kudos to the staff and owners that revived this location.
My wife and I have dined here over a dozen times since it opened a little less than a year ago.  The food is always delicious, the service is fantastic and the drinks are generally well-made.  The restaurant also has a lot of seating so reservations are easy to come by and walk-ins are doable for small parties (2-4).  Overall a great choice if you're in the mood for some Italian food in Palo Alto.
I LOVED the ambiance of this place! Wonderful decor, a front wall that opens completely, gorgeous lighting....I could go on. I didn't like what I ordered, by that's my fault!  I never like risotto, but so many people do that I continue to try to find one that will win me over...not this one.  It came wrapped in prosciutto like a gift; in my opinion too much, making it too salty.  The large shrimp that came with it were nicely done, but since I wasn't eating the prosciutto, didn't seem like enough protein. The rice portion seemed bland...which it always does to me. The cesar salad was tasty for sure, but the lettuce leaves were room temp, so not crunchy.  The croutons were miniscule. NEXT TIME:  I'll get the Misto salad, which my companions enjoyed, and try one of the pasta dishes and one of the meat or fish courses. But I still stick with my 5 star rating because I loved the setting so much, and our waiter was terrific!
We came into Palo Alto on a busy Friday night and were set on eating wherever parking was available on/off of University. As fate would have it we found a spot directly out in front of Cafe Renzo. The place was packed and there was a half hour wait so we gave our name and took the last two seats at the bar, where we eventually remained for the evening...the seats were comfy and the bartenders were friendly, but a little absentminded, e.g., empty promises for water refills and more bread. The kitchen was a little on the slow side, too. We only ordered appetizers and had to wait about a half hour for them. That was sort of annoying, but we did have some bread to tide us over and the wine also helped. The marinated olives are great, the "crab cake" isn't really a crab cake but more like lump crab over mashed potatoes; the portabella with arugula was tops, and we enjoyed the bruschetta, too. We rounded the night off with some dessert (taramisu and creme brulee), which were both flippin' good, along with some cappuccino. The bill was steep, but we expected that. Overall, we'll probably come back again if we land a similar parking spot, but if you like Italian, I'd definitely give this place a chance.
Well, once again, this location puts on a new face (formerly Coppola's then Loui Loui. As Renzo's the interior is still very attractive. The service was friendly and prompt. We dropped in for breakfast. Not a lot of real breakfast choices so we chose smoked salmon paninis. They were good but not great. Could have had more salmon and a little more flavor and spark with some onion in them too. Place hasn't been open long so we will give them more than another shot. We'll come back to try a dinner. Renzo seemed very eager to please.
New place on University Ave.  Their official grand opening is Tues 5/25 but according to the hostess they have been around for a couple of months.  We had dinner there last night and were impressed by the food, service and ambience.  We're coming back with friends. Prices were typical for the area, but the portion sizes were large.  Our entrees were gnocchi, tagliotini with shrimp, cioppino and a pepperoni calzone.  Fresh ingredients, savory sauces and excellent pasta.  Prices for the calzones were relatively cheap for dinner (~$10) but the calzone was the largest I've ever seen at a restaurant.  The mussel appetizer and chocolate souffle (15 minute wait) were excellent. Service was very friendly and ambience was social - good for small groups and more casual date nights.  Not too loud and not too quiet.  nice "curb appeal." Things to improve: salad dish was evenly coated with dressing/oil but dominated by oil taste, bathrooms need more regular maintenance
As a Celiac I often avoid Italian restaurants like the plague (it's just cruel...), but there were some tasty looking dishes on the menu that looked okay for someone who is gluten free so we gave it a shot. I tried the chicken with prosciutto  served with veggies and potatoes (if you're doing gluten free ask for it sans flour). It was super delicious, I'm not usually a member of the clean plate club, but I was this evening :) My friend had the gnocchi al gorgonzola, gnocchi was good but the sauce was extra cheesy so be prepared :) Service was good, everyone was attentive, and my dish specifically gets 5 stars. I'll definitely go back. Great ambiance as well (including outdoor seating). Yum!
Day: Sunday between 1 & 3 pm Food: Arugala Salad and Pizza The salad was what really disgusted me. It was full of yellow and brown leaves. When turning it around with my fork, I found this all the way through the salad. Completely unacceptable. Sent it back and the server did not seem surprised, or dissappointed and did not apologize. He did offer another salad, which I declined. Pizza: The crust was nice. But the ingredients did not tast fresh at all. Tomatoes were kind of pale and flavourless. The olives were brined, which was a nice flavor. Overall: I hope it was an off time for them. I don't think I will return to find out, unless my husband really wants to give it a second chance.
Porcini slugs anyone?? Okay... I've never eaten slugs before, but after eating here, I can't stop associating porcini mushrooms with slugs--- I mean, even the taste! After my friend Linh persuaded me to try something different (I usually get gnocchi with Gorgonzola sauce-- at every place), and after the waiter said it was really good, I decided to try the meat ravioli with the porcini cream sauce. Before trying anything else, I tried the porcini sauce. It had a pretty good flavor, but the ravioli itself was WAY underdone. I mean... really, really, hard!!! The meat filling tasted old... like old feet (or how I imagine old feet to taste like). Not only that, the porcini mushrooms were WAY overdone. They had this weird gelatinous texture to them. It was the most gross, most weird textured thing I've ever put in my mouth!!! It really almost made me want to vomit. Right there, at the table, next to the uberly dressed up ppl. Man... maybe I ordered the wrong thing? It wouldn't have been that bad, but the damn waiter recommended it to me. WTF? And not only was my food disgusting, the waiter did not come by at all for any of our drink refills. Which is probably because they don't offer any drink refills to begin with.. which is fine, but I really could have used something to wash down the porcini slugs. Damn you Cafe Renzo for making me hate porcini mushrooms. Damn you!!!
Came for dinner, but happy hour was the best! Usually with cheap cocktails, you get a terrible selection of the watered down concoctions, but not with Renzo's. I went with a friend at around 5 for happy hour, and the bartender was friendly, as were the regulars. It wasn't just that; I loved the ambiance, and it was extremely low key compared to the hustle and bustle of University Avenue. I only hope it doesn't get overrun with Stanford students once the school year starts. I'll definitely be back here again, even if just for the happy hours :)
One of the best Italian places I've eaten at. Hands down the best caprese salad I've ever had and really good bruschetta as well. Service is great. I love how it's family owned and all the staff is very friendly. Graciano is the best waiter ever. Every time we go he gives us free limoncello after dinner. This place makes me feel like I'm really in Italy and I love it. We've never been disappointed by any dish either. The scallops are amazing and so is the capellini pomodoro with chicken and mushrooms. Love this place. Went there last night for the third time and am already craving it again. Btw-try the champagne martini!
Dear Mr. Renzo Azzarello and Staff, I wanted to write in concern for my experience at your cafe last night. I think it is important to bring this to your attention as well as for the safety of your business. First, I was on a date with a man that I was not that well acquainted with and was enjoying a glass of wine in your bar area. Unfortunately, the date went sour, and I began to feel both very uncomfortable and unsafe. Although the service was excellent, as usual, my date's comments concerned me. I politely excused myself to the restroom to possible ask for your waitstaff help or an exit out the back door and was abruptly stopped by one of your male waiters. The kitchen staff was unconcerned and your male waiter who was working the 8pm + shift followed me out the back exit and asked for a payment. I was in shock that his concern was the bill of one glass of Presecco versus the safety of a customer? Most importantly, a woman alone in the back area. He asked for a debit card so he could run the bill! I was blown away. I asked him if he could just comp my one single glass and he told me no. I said that my date would be responsible for the bill. I pulled out my cell phone and began to call the police. Luckily, I maintained my boundaries and left unattended to my car. Clearly, it was evident the bill was more important than the safety and policies of your business? I have frequented your cafe on many occasions and feel most comfortable in an inviting and family-like Italian atmosphere, however, this will change my impression. I am asking kindly that you review your safety procedures for customers who may be feeling unsafe or uncomfortable. In the big picture, a cafe's reputation is far more important than a single woman being both scared and unsafe. I should have been escorted out of the cafe and the police should have been promptly notified. Thank you for your time.
Nothing but 5 stars all the way.  These guys know how to do it right!  Never disappoints :)
I came to Cafe Renzo because my Italian language teacher from Milan said that this was her favorite in the area.  I've been to Italy three years in a row and I am planning our next trip to Italy this September.  In short, my husband and I are Italophiles living in Palo Alto.  We are here because we work in technology and have family in the area but if Silicon Valley was transplanted to Milan, I think we would be there tomorrow. So I was pleasantly surprised with dinner tonight at Cafe Renzo.  I've lived in the bay area all my life, lived in Palo Alto the past two years, and in SF before that.  I had never thought to try Cafe Renzo primarily because we classified it as one of the sub-standard University Avenue restaurants who got business primarily due to location.  I'm so glad we were wrong! It is hard in the bay area to find an Italian restaurant with a good Italian wine list so I was very, very impressed with Cafe Renzo's extensive selection.  Also, as an American with limited knowledge of Italian geography, I appreciated that Cafe Renzo segmented their vino di rossos by region (and I hope to sample wines from every region on future visits!).  I was extremely happy with my Cascina Ca'Rosso Nebbiolo from the Piemonte region.  Molto bene! During our dinner, my husband and I reminisced about our recent trip to Europe and we both quickly agreed it reminded us of the time we spent sitting in cafes there.  The ambiance at Cafe Renzo is so easy to fall in love with.  The outdoor seating has overhead heaters, is very comfortable, perfect for people watching, but also super intimate at the same time.  There is also a great attention to detail with the restaurant decor.  I noticed that the glasses and water carafes came from Italy. The ravioli with spinach and ricotta in a tangy and sweet tomato sauce was bellissima.  We enjoyed the caprese salad.  If we had to give one piece of feedback, we weren't in love with the pizza margherita primarily because it seemed to be more American style. I gather that was to please the local tastebuds.  I would suggest they offer a more Napoli style pizza with large pieces of mozarella, instead of the shredded pieces, use thinner or crunchier crust, and add basil. I'm looking forward to being a regular.  Ciao!
I went here expecting a fabulous meal based on the reviews. I was disappointed. I came with a group of 10 people and the waiter was so rude to us. I hate when waiters are rude you're in a big group or you are young so they can treat you poorly. The bread was not even that good. The decorations are pretty however. The food was expensive, and I was not particularly impressed with my sausage risotto. They took so long to bring us out our food. They only positive thing I can remember from there is probably the cool water jugs. All in all, a terrible experience. They would not even help us split the check in half or anything! I don't think I'm coming back.
I had dinner with a group of friends at Renzo on the fifth night this new place was open for dinner.  Most places are still in the shake down phase at this point and I would not normally post until more time had passed to allow the kinks to be worked out. But some of the things I observed--good and bad--are likely to be part of the hard wiring of the place so I think they are worth mentioning at this point. First, the best thing about the evening was the food.  Several of us had salmon piccata and it was cooked to perfection.  I asked to have the salmon cooked "well-done" and the waiter pushed back.  He said the salmon would be ruined if it were cooked that way.  But he said he would make sure the salmon was cooked all the way through without being dried out.  He--and the chef--both came through perfectly. The piccata sauce was perfect and the salmon was moist and flavorful.  It was served with green beans which were also perfectly cooked. Second, prices were nicely tiered.  There were inexpensive items on the menu if you wanted to eat cheap. Even the high-priced entrees were not outrageously expensive. Also, the service was for the most part very good. We were greeted and seated promptly.  Water, bread and olive oil/balsamic were filled often  When the food was ready several servers helped our waiter get it to the table quickly so that everyone could be served at about the same time. So what didn't work. The biggest issue for me is that the five of us were seated at a booth that would have been plenty comfortable for a party of two.  We were not comfortable.  I looked around as we were leaving to see if we could have been seated at a larger table.  I cannot say for sure but I do not think there were any larger tables and it did not look like the booths and tables could be moved together to accommodate a large group. Also, the owner stopped by our table twice.  Once was ok for a new place but twice was too much. Our waiter was also ultimately a problem.  He was very pushy suggesting dishes and talked endlessly about a wine he thought we should try.  One of the guys in the group knows a lot about wine and he is always eager to try something new.  He finally ordered a glass--which was pretty slow in coming--to see what the big deal was. There was no big deal.  Several of us had a taste of the wine and we generally agreed that it tasted pretty much like a decent, average Sauvignon blanc. The waiter had pushed this wine so hard we were expecting something much more special; maybe even exotic. If I were guessing I would speculate that the wait staff is on trial and employees who do not sell SOMETHING as an add-on to the check are on the bubble. One more thing...the business card for Renzo lists a website for the place at http://www.caferenzo.com .  When I tried that url I found myself at a Go-Daddy home page.  I got to the same place when I clicked on the url above.  The url is not for sale so I assume there will be a website someday. Palo Alto is a place where you can hardly swing a piece of fusilli without hitting a decent, upscale Italian restaurant.   For right now that is how I would categorize Renzo...decent but not yet special.
Excellent Italian in Palo Alto.  I went to my husband last week for dinner and it was really outstanding.  Nice ambiance for people watching,  I really liked the bruschetta, the wild mushroom soup and the seafood spaghetti I had. I thought the service was excellent - attentive and thoughtful.  We had a real Italian waiter -  not common around here. We got complimentary lemoncello drinks after our meal!
I love this spot. My shop is just around the corner- and sometimes I'll stop in for a happy hour drink and salad. The daytime barkeep is way cool and fun to talk to- he makes good drinks and I like his attitude! I ADORE the ceasar salad. It is bar none, the best in all of Palo Alto. The lil bread is alway fresh and hot. That just makes me happy thinking about it. Oh, the owner and chief in command, Renzo- what a character!!! He is fun to talk to and so passionate about his business. Get down there and try it out...
Just wanted to update my review in light of a few oddly negative comments by others.  We have been dining here about once a week since the day Cafe Renzo opened.  We have had only lovely experiences with the food, the service, and the ambience.  Be assured that the waiters are authentic Italians, and excellent at what they do.  The busboys are extremely efficient and very nice.  Renzo is extraordinarily hard-working, and has put his heart and soul into his restaurant.  The clientele is a good mix-- families, couples, and groups of all ages.  The bar is beautiful, and the bartenders are great fun and mix a mean drink.  It is not a fluke that we have had consistently wonderful times here.
I loved Niebaum-Coppola and Loui Loui, but am completely smitten with Cafe Renzo.  To enjoy glorious... Read more 
When we first found this place out, my husband and I used to go like twice a week we stopped going for like a month an we went back yesterday. I ordered Tagliata Fiorentina grilled 12 oz. New York steak served on a bed of arugula, sprinkled with shaved parmesan, with a side of grilled zucchini eggplant steak medium, but unfortunately it came well done so, I had to send it back and it came back wonderful at the end we both asked our waiter to get our left overs to go so we waited and waited and we finally asked what was going on I guess they didn't hear us when we asked because they got tossed, too bad.
3rd time back here, Food is awesome, crew is like family. Tell them that you came to meet Mario and get special treatment
Oustanding!  Excellent dishes and great atmosphere.
Went here for dinner with my bf, and we were welcomed by a very unfriendly hostess. I thought our waiter would be better because he was pretty friendly, but his service was bad. We had to wait 30 mins until he came over to our table and get our order. The wait for the food was about 40 mins. The food was really good BUT not worth it for the price nor the serving. We will not come here again.
A-ok.  The children also liked it so we'll be returning.
I met an old friend for lunch at Renzo's not too long ago.    The food was great and the service was top-notch.     but what made me write this review is the following.. After the meal was done,  I got the bill and proceeded to pay.   Added the tip and when I wrote in the total,  well apparently I had forgotten how to add because I added an extra $10.00 to the total.  I noticed when I came home, then I checked my account and even though in the total I wrote a value, they re-calculated it and charged me the price of food plus what I intended to leave for tip.     That was a relief and really cool.   I already made plans to go back and this time I am bringing my calculator...
Food is good, not excellent. Debatable whether it's worth the price.
If I had the opportunity to gain 30 new potential customers from a DishCrawl, I would have thought harder about what I served.
Food is very good.  Decoration very nice.  Service very good & the place is kid friendly, at the same time, has an excellent bar for young professionals to hangout.  Basically got everyone covered and the prices are very, very reasonable.  Definitely my favorite Italian place around the area.
Renzo Cafe was a total disappointment. Service was poor. The waiter took our order then the busboy served all our food with poor etiquette (i.e: sliding the plates across the table). Meanwhile, the waiter walked around our table awkwardly with nothing to do. We were seated close to the kitchen, next to a stack of folded table cloths on the chairs next to us. Worst of all one of the waiters started sorting silverware next to us halfway through our meal. It was very loud! When we let him know it was bothering us he gave us a dirty look and carried on. He continued to give us dirty looks through our time at the restaurant. UNACCEPTABLE The food was subpar for ~$20 dishes. The veal was very thin and dry and smothered in cheese. The sauce in the spaghetti was made with some sort of powder base (grainy texture). Not worth going to this restaurant. It is all for show.
I give it 3.5 stars. Staff is friendly and prompt. Food is better than average overall, though not spectacular. The bread rolls they give should really be served with butter, not the olive oil dip. Or they should switch to sliced rustic bread. We started with the caprese salad. The bufala mozzarella was not quite as flavorful as others I've had, but still nice. My entree was the spinach ravioli, which I liked quite a lot. The tomato sauce was tangy and the pasta itself was nicely done. My wife had the cornish hen which she also enjoyed. We finished it off with the chocolate souffle. It was closer to a lava cake than a souffle, though. The chocolate ooze in the center was very sugary. Not a bad place to eat, certainly better than Madison & Fifth who occupied it before them.
While walking down university ave. on a Sunday evening and deciding where to go, we came upon Cafe Renzo. The ambiance and the menu seemed inviting and were seated immediately. I had the homemade tagliolini with fresh wild mushrooms & black tiger prawns. The pasta was cooked okay, but the mushrooms and the prawns mixed together with their sauces and taste made the dish very delicious. Overall a good experience. Will definitely go back to have the different courses!
Awesome restaurant brand new,nice place vibrant, friendly  staff and the food are top notch.Highly recomended! Lito E.
solid 3 stars.  food is ok.  service is 50/50.  sometimes, they'll be right on with service - food comes on time, no mistakes, water comes to the table right away.  other times, it'll take forever for someone to notice you.  they are never rude though... just annoying when you are trying to get back to work. nothing special.  a little nicer than cheesecake factory for decor.  good drinks/wine menu.
Overall, there's nothing major that stood out about the meal and there were no major flaws. The serving sizes were pretty nice, especially the cheese platter. The flavors of each of the cheese flavors were not very distinct - but they did give hefty slices of the cheese - so I got to eat a lot of it... and I love cheese! The veal saltimbocca was good, but the broccoli rabe was more bitter than I'm used to. The gnocchi was good. The servers were very attentive. All in all, an okay meal.
The food and service were excellent.  Soups devine!  Will definitely go back!
Really disappointing visit Friday August 12.  I'd only been to this place once before and my spouse and I took another couple there today at 6 PM.  What a debacle.  The restaurant was nearly empty when we arrived but we waited five minutes for any service and then another 10 for drinks. Appetizers came OK but one of the entrees was ordered wrong and we did not get the replacement until the other three were done entirely with their food.  The food was OK although the late entree seemed undercooked when it did come. After the last person finished we sat for several minutes before the table was cleared and then at least ten more before we got the chocolate souffle we had had the unfortunate idea of ordering with dinner.  No one ever offered us coffee; we finally stopped someone and asked but then, fifteen minutes later, long after the souffle had finally arrived, still no coffee. We told the waiter how unhappy we were (with reason!) and he said sorry and gave us the full bill.  Ten minutes after that he finally picked up our credit card and got it back to us. This was a miserable visit and I do not recommend this restaurant.  There are so many better places around!  Gambardella's in Menlo Park has a better menu and much better souffle, and Cafe Pro Bono has better food and better service.  I strongly suggest anyone try those restaurants before this dog.  Two thumbs way way down.
I am really surprised by the less than favorable reviews from others.  We tried this place on a whim a couple of months ago and have been back four times.  The food is excellent.  The Cappellini Pomodoro is the best I have had.  The Calzones are excellent and the Bruschetta is first rate.  Specials have also been great. Anybody complaining about the service has obviously never been to a restaurant in Italy.  The service is not fast-food quick but not slow either and the waiters and busboys have always been very friendly and attentive. The atmosphere is very attractive and comfortable.  It is especially fun when the weather is nice and the patio doors are open.  Now I want to go again.
We have eaten here twice. Both meals were great. The service was friendly and they were there when we needed them without being intrusive. I love the bruschetta! Very fresh and flavorful
Im writing this for service. We had a reservation here for 8.45. We reached on time and were offered a table next to the kitchen so we opted to wait for a better table.half an hour later the dumb hostess took us back to the same table. She had started seating other ppl who came after us in the front of the restaurant. Besides this there was a dumb girl at the bar who served Scotch in a wine glass and something that tasted like ash wen I asked for grey goose vodka with sprite. We left the place without even finishing our drinks.
Must have been a bad night for the Kicthen & wait staff  ..nothing seemed to work that well. While it was busy but not packed we sat down at 715pm .. Bread was good with a light balsmic and oil dipping suace. One dish had to be returned as the shrimp in the risotto had an awful smell and was removed from the table .. tumed most of us off very quickly.. most dishes were served cold .. we did not complain as it woudl have taken too long and woudl have been late .. 8pm at this time....we were  thinking that our meals  sat for awhile.. Will not return . ... PA has changed in a negative way in our opioion...demi graphics along with overall feel is not to our tastes any longer...    we lived  there for over 20 years . recently (2009)  we moved to the Tri Valley....Danville and Livermore area's is better  suited for our lifestyle along with our  dining experince  .
Really great atmosphere and friendly waiters. There is a man at the door who is a hostess - he is the "not so nice" unless your dressed in fur and diamonds. His snubbed demeanor was aggressive! But my friends and I got a good laugh out of it!  There is a women who also works at the door who is very nice. The food is good and our waiter was amazing. The bar drinks are fun.  I wish I remembered the name of our waiter and the female hostess.
GREAT SERVICE, GREAT FOOD, GREAT WINE LIST, GREAT AMBIANCE, GREAT VALUE, AND, A GREAT HAPPY HOUR (4-7 SEVEN DAYS) -- RENZO GETS IT!!!  Clearly the best Italian experience on the Peninsula or in the South Bay.  This coming from a Jersey Boy who knows!
we came here for a quick lunch before we walked around the stanford shopping center.  it was very empty which should've given us and idea of things to come. service was abysmally slow for an empty restaurants and they made multiple mistakes with our order.  i got the piadina romagnola (a quesadilla like dish with prosciutto and crescenza cheese) and she got the caprino panini (a caprese like panini).  my dish came out on time but they brought out a prosciutto and mozzarella panini for her instead.  we had to ask two waiters to fix the mistake before it was resolved.  after she had gotten her actual panini, another server brings out another caprino panini.  clearly there's some gaps in communication between the wait staff and the kitchen. i'm sure we might've caught them at a bad time but with hardly any other diners in the restaurant it's pretty inexcusable. at least my dish tasted just OK.
Great outdoor seating at this beautiful restaurant.  I uderstand it's newest incarnation is a stylish yet casual restaurant.
I love this place! The service is impeccable, the coffee is the best on the Peninsula. The shrimp spinach salad with warm lemon dressing is so flavorful ! The dressing turns the goat cheese into a creamy dreamy delight  - your taste buds will jump up and down for joy! I could easily eat my way through this menu (and I'm only talking about my lunch experiences) - but that shrimp salad. Ahhh...it's hard to order something new when you've had an experience like this. Oh, and I didn't mention the fresh rolls! The bread basket is not what you might expect. You'll be presented with a freshly baked, by them, hot, crusty, chewy roll, fresh out of their oven. The rolls are so fresh, you might burn your fingers on them. They are delish. What a treat! I can't believe it took me so long to find Cafe Renzo. I work in Palo Alto, and finally just decided to zip in. Wow. It is now my favorite Palo Alto restaurant. Great ambiance, terrific service, and the food so far is marvelous. That reminds me: I need to go back and try a dessert....
My first time at this restaurant and I was very disappointed. The service was poor.  The waiter was not at all friendly and he never told us about the specials.  I was really surprised when I heard him telling the table of 4 guys next to us about the specials after we had ordered.  I think he had low expectations for a tip because we were two women and I was not drinking alcohol that week. A shame because we are pretty generous tippers actually. I ordered the pea soup to start, and could not eat it because it was so salty. It was also unbelievably hot. They must keep them in a hot oven before serving. I ordered a mini-penne pasta with smoked salmon and pancetta and it was also way too salty.   Dessert and the expresso were good. We had to flag down a waiter for water refills, and waited forever for the check. At least they did not charge us for the salty pea soup.
Cafe Renzo is great! The service is spectacular, they have great options for any picky foodie, and they have a great cocktail menu (a must have).
Have been there multiple times for dinner, and it has been great every time.  J always orders the same thing: the spinach salad and the filet mignon.  She loves them both, and I can't get her to try anything else! To start, I've had the Caponata which is great, and now I'm loving the Hearts of Palm salad. For entrees, I've had the Cioppino and multiple seafood specials- all great. Highly recommended.
Brand new, a few kinks in the service, but it was a great meal.  The staff could not have been nicer or more friendly and the food was quite good.  I love supporting a new business and these guys seem to be on it.  As they approach their actual grand opening (supposedly a couple of weeks away), I assume things will tighten up. I'm sorry to see Loui Loui go, but they were pretty much knuckleheads, anyways.  I hope Renzo thrives!
Nice ambiance and convenient but the portions are sort of small.  I ordered the special the other night, pumpkin ravioli with walnut sauce.  It tasted nice but I got only four ravioli, sauce, and a couple of walnuts sprinkled on top.  I paid about $20 and when done left the restaurant still hungry.
We had a  group recently eat here.  I must say it was excellent!  Everyone was very pleasant and friendly. The service was excellent...it was personal and attentive in a positive way. I had the salmon and it was amazing.  The sauce and favors were perfect. Everyone cleared their plates and we all enjoyed ourselves.  We will definately go back!
At last we found ourselves an Italian restaurant that Giada would be proud of and that too at stone's throw instead of going all the way upto north beach in SFO. Excellent gnocchi and ravioli dishes,they have a really nice Cabernet pairing with the food. Our recent discovery is indeed a hidden gem in good ol Stanford land...
this is my favorite hang out in Palo Alto for italian food, italian music, and italian friends, the menu has always something new and it's  so good to find a place where i can have a homemade meal anytime i want without having to go back to Rome to my mom :) my favorite is the pasta that is always cook as it shoul be  'al dente" unfortunatly is hard to find real italian food in the US because everybody cook the pasta too soft, sorry, maybe i am a pain in the ass for that, but at cafe Renzo i can have the pasta as it should be , "al dente'  never  mushy !  I suggest to everybody to give a try , and you will see once you have pasta there, you won't be happy anywherelse , and the wine selection form Sicily is impressive, cheers !
Awesome place, real italian food , great staff !
Oh Renzo, we adore you!  Delicious pizza that is cut in front of you and those olives, I love those marinated olives.  Wish we could visit you more often...thank you for the hospitality!
Good food, interesting cocktails (esp the iced tea one), nice ambiance. Very poor service esp given that we were a larger group at dinner - we had to remind the waiter about bread and had to keep looking around several times to get his attention to order additional items and request flatware during dinner. Besides, I was not too impressed by the use of Italian while taking our order - seemed too hokey (they do it better in North Beach in SF, IMHO).
Very decent, upscale-casual place to eat. We parked in the lot around the corner - by CPK - and walked over no problem. We met friends there but there were tables available for walk-ins on a Thursday nite at 7.  Good hearty bread, great sausage and mushroom risotto (although the gorgonzola sauce advertised was not very manifest) and the bf got the bolognese. Pasta was cooked perfectly all around; the gnocchi was the best though. Order it with pink sauce - it's not on the menu, apparently - not too 'alfredoy' but not too rich-red either. Entrees were around $12 to $22, but stay away from the cognac menu --  $250 for 2 oz, yikes!  Service was excellent. Too loud for my taste, but we were in the exact middle of the dining room, so can't really be too picky there.
Sat outside - the waiter nagged and nagged us about eating.  We were meeting casually with a group of friends and just wanted to go with the flow.  We were ordering plenty of drinks and snacks so this attitude ruined an otherwise pleasant evening. This even though all the other outdoor tables were empty!
Renzo replaces the prior Frances Ford Coppola restaurant, but the waiters are the same, and though it seems odd that downtown PA is attracting yet another Italian restaurant (must be the 10th?), I must say it's a nice addition that we'll eat at again soon.  The place got a nice makeover, and the menu has a good mix of options without bewildering you with too many choices.  My husband and I had a late night Wed dinner here and it was nearly empty.  Service was good and the execution on all the dishes was solid.  We enjoyed the beef carpaccio (nicely sliced paper thin and garnished with nice parmagianno reggiano cheese), splurged on the spaghetti carbonara (a bit too much cream for my taste, but otherwise delicious) and enjoyed the braised rabbit (tender, good portion size, slightly sweet sauce.
I can't even describe how atrocious the service was on our Saturday afternoon brunch. The place was busy but not full and there were definitely not enough staff..anywhere.  And the ones that were working were running around like chickens with their heads cut off (except for the hostess, more on that in a sec). Two tables away from us the gentleman was literally screaming out for a menu because apparently the hostess did not provide any when they were seated.  Not ten minutes later a gentleman was seated at the table next to us and he too was not given a menu and was calling out for one! WTF??? I am not one to criticize because I know everyone can have a bad day but if you are the hostess you need to grab some menus BEFORE you take people to their table.  At Cafe Renzo this was the hostess's only responsibility, so that she could not do this right was frightening. Once people were seated she just stood at the little kiosk doing nothing, no helping ring up checks, no bringing checks to tables, no bringing bread baskets, not even telling the wait staff about their new tables she sat.  Now maybe that's the gig that you just seat and wait but when your servers are struggling to provide basic service you would think you could do something to help out. Maybe that's just us.... Tables that were seated and ordered after us were served before us. When our food finally arrived it was lukewarm and had we not been so hungry from waiting forever would have sent it back. Even if our food were hot, it was mediocre at best and that's being generous. No idea how this place has four stars! Maybe it was an off day and 4 people called in sick but we won't waste our time going back.
Went there after apple store service. The place is clean and comfit. Cedar Brook melot is very smooth and tasty, and not very heavy which is perfect for me. The food there is right in amount (not very heavy), so if you expect a big meal perhaps you need order more than one entry. The pasta is very flavored and nice source. A good place for a casual dinner. Not tried happy hour yet, might go there someday when I'm around Palo Alto again.
Not bad, I'd give it a 3.5 if I could.  Pizza was about a 3.5.  My wife had risotto and the consistency/texture was off, so about a 2.  Service was very good, I'd give 4 or 5 for that.  Overall a nice place, maybe the dishes we picked weren't their best.
Friendly and nice but the food doesn't taste well. Mediocre at best. You see appetizing items on the menu (like ossobuco, rabbit and souffle) but they aren't made right. Good thing it is not overpriced. But still disappointing :-(
Was here with friends for happy hour.  We were supposed to go to a different place but ended up here (the other place was closed for a private party) - we were very pleasantly surprised.  Food was great - had the potato croquettes, calamari, bufalotto and mushroom & asparagus spring rolls.  Our waiter was the best - he came back oftent to check up on us and made sure we were okay.  I even left home with a menu.  Will be back again.  This place is still very new - only open for 18 days - so check it out before everyone else finds out about it!
A good measure of an Italian restaurant is the Caesar salad and this one is horrible. It's watery and gloppy all at the same time, and the croutons came from Costco for sure. The bread was cold in the middle and the servers were overtaxed, for reasons I couldn't discern, and weird. Even for Palo Alto, this restaurant blows.
I usually visited Cafe Renzo with my girlfriends after work, but occasionally brought my bf.  The food is so-so and the drink are decent but over-priced.  This is a decent location for an evening with friends/significant others, but I will have to say one negative thing- there are several waiters/bartenders who are plain creepy.  Creepy in the "What's your name?" sort of way.  When I go out for drinks/ to eat, I would prefer if the staff didn't hit on me (or overly stare at me).  It kind of creeps me out to feel like I have to be on guard while trying to have fun.  I would recommend this place with this exception in mind.  And if you do go- try the spanokopita :)
Italian nouvelle cuisine with prices in Euros (i.e. very small portions @ high prices) Pretty disappointing overall.
Had a good spinach salad and the spaghetti with prosciutto was very good. Service was great, nice atmosphere. The waitress told us the owners mother is from Sicily and hand makes the stuffed pastas every morning. Next time I'm going to try one of those! Prices were good for University ave.
It's great italian food at a great price. Family owned restaurant with great service and nice wine selection! Nice alternative to other italian places downtown...
Geez Can't believe how wonderful this place is! Sicilian family owned! Genuine Europe!
I had a pizza and the arugula salad.  The salad was great but the pizza was mediocre due to a flat, tough, tasteless crust.  It seemed like they didn't put any effort into making the dough and creating a great crust, probably using a rolling pin to shape the dough.  The topping was fine but it didn't make up for the crust..  I wonder if this lack of attention to this important detail reflects the rest of their fare.
I have been eating at Cafe' Renzo for the third time in the last two months. Everyone I brought along  was as happy as I was. When you hear there is Mom cooking in the kitchen, you bet the food is going to be good. Renzo Cafe' offers home style,  brasserie type food and it  deserves a 5 star for what it is. We had mussels in a wine sauce and stuffed calamari (Totani). The owner, Renzo recognized me and came to my table to greet me and my friend. He let us try his Mom newly created  after dinner drink made with Pinot Grigio and kumquats. It was a special treat, absolutely good and will order it again and again, if he has it. Also, he produces something nobody has: "Sfogliatelle". They are mignonette pastry, filled with a cream of ricotta cheese, a specialty from Naples Italy. They are served warm and they are just a couple of bites of decadence. He offers them for breakfast too. A real treat worth the returning trip.
Yikes! The service here was quick and courteous but the food was awful. I had a pannini, served on rather soggy bread, and a minestrone that tasted like spoiled vegetables in a tomato broth (I sent it back). My wife was unhappy with her sausage & egg scramble as well. We really liked the old Niebaum-Coppola so it is disappointing to have it followed up with this. We had the brunch menu, perhaps dinner is better.
Enjoyed dinner at Renzo this evening. (Note: I've decided to award stars in relation to the expectation, including price, so I can give even cheap restaurants high marks if they succeed at what they set out to accomplish.) The service was attentive and prompt, and our waiter was ready with suggestions for food and wine. They did somehow fail to record our reservation, but we were seated promptly nonetheless. I started with the caponata, featuring carmelized onions and roasted eggplant. Served cold, the dish was beautifully presented and quite delicious. It was sweet with a nice texture. The onions slightly overpowered the eggplant, but the dish worked. For main course I had the rabbit, another dish with carmelized onions and carrots in the sauce. The rabbit was good, not amazing, but tasty. The sauce was maybe a bit too sweet--I suspect there was a fair amount of sugar in there, but I can't be sure. Still, it didn't overpower the dish, and I was satisfied. Overall, an improvement over Louis Louis, and a worthy successor to the Coppola efforts in earlier incarnations at this spot.
We decided to try this place because we saw that they had happy hour. my boyfriend had never been to a happy hour so we decided to try it. oh man! we got such a great buzz for 20 bucks!! their drink are really good! i had a few bellinis, i think they were less than 5 bucks. so of couse, being buzzed and all we were suddenly starving. i got a pizza which was thin and crispy. the cheese was gooey and awesome. he got past with scallops and oysters and a bunch of seafood, it was really good as well. our waitor was very nice and polite, we never felt rushed or uncomfortable. I highly recommend this place if you're in the area!!
Service was slow.  Appetizer salads were good, but entres had no falvor.  Very loud inside. Would not recommend this place.
This place has quite an intriguing menu. I'm not one that is fond of standard Italian fare- pasta bolognese, carbonara, etc. But this place actually impressed me! First off, I had the Bruschetta. But this isn't any regular bruschetta that you get- ya know- the one w/ chopped up tomatoes, basil. This was actually a single piece of tomato, like a steak, atop the bread. Quite delicious! The Calamari Fritti was nothing of note. For the main course, i had the prosciutto wrapped diver scallops. Not too impressive really. The place had 4 small scallops (wrapped w/ the prosciutto) on each corner, w/ a huge mount of mashed potatoes in the middle. Someone failed the plating and presentation class at culinary school. I did sample the tagliatelle though- not too shabby. Even though i had a weak main course, there were a few other dishes that caught my attention- Halibut Dore for example. The atmosphere is pleasant, will a fully stocked bar- down to the Louis Trez on the top shelf. Overall, i was please with the experience and will be returning.
Good ambiance and the food is good, but service left me shocked.  We went to Cafe Renzo to celebrate a birthday.  We got a nice table and the atmosphere of the place is nice.  The waiter though keep rushing us I felt even though the place was almost empty.  We got our food and all of it was tasty - not sure if should be as pricey as it is, but it was tasty.  Bill came we did the math for tip and paid.  As my friend walked to the restroom he is intercepted by the waiter asking if all was OK and if there were any issues.  My friend said "No all was great thank you".  Waiter then proceeds to ask him why he was not tipped at a higher percent!!!  Our friend that did the math did the tip at 15% to try to round the number.  But to have  a waiter confront you over a tip that was so shocking!  The food was OK and so was service (he rushed us for a birthday dinner with an empty restaurant) but it was not worth a 20% tip.  Based on this experience we will not be going back.  Il Fornaio is way better, great atmosphere and we have never been rushed nor confronted because of a tip that did not meet a waiter's standards!
I have eaten and had drinks here since they opened and they cease to amaze me with the service and family atmosphere.  Knowing that mom is in the kitchen making fresh bread and deserts just gives me more of an appetite!!!
I have been here twice.  One lunch, one dinner.  Will not go back -- ever. Service was uniformly awful both times.  Slow, then brusque, then rude.  Waiters and busboys reach across plates, bump repeatedly into you and your chair, forget things (i.e. water), were unreliable re suggestions. And all that seems good compared to the  food. Beef ravioli in porcini sauce was strongly recommended by the waiter.  It was, as another reviewer notes here,  horrid -- gloppy, poorly cooked, off flavor.  At lunch the pizza was at a similar level -- soggy crust, cheap, gloppy cheese, cheap ham that tasted like it came from a cold cut package. The beer is good.  The spot on the sidewalk is nice. This place ought to be much, much better.  Stay away.
Great place! How a place handles things when they go a little off is a key indicator of the quality of the experience. A couple hiccups, one at the bar, one with the kitchen, but both quickly rectified. Good food, excellent service (the 5'8" Italian server), on-it bus people. I'm sending my friends! Thanks Renzos!
im giving this place 5 stars because of their happy hour. it is a great find, and a secret gem of palo alto. from 3-6pm everyday (even on the weekends) there are super well-priced and delicious appetizers ($5-7) and $5 cocktails, $4 wine. the presentation of the food and drinks is lovely, and the drinks are high quality -- fresh fruit puree belinis, fresh lemon juice lemon drops, etc. its an upscale restaurant so i think people dont assume they would have such good deals for happy hour, but they do! outdoor seating is great, feels very european, and more fun than sitting inside. waiters are always humerous and friendly, and i love that they serve hot bread right away when you come in
My main complaint is the service. It was maybe just my server or they were under staffed, etc. but it was poor.  The food was good but not excellent. I won't hurry back
Came here for happy hour.  Didn't eat any food just drank.  Very friendly and festive atmosphere.  I'll be back!
We always loved Coppola and were very excited when it looked like the new Cafe Renzo had a similar menu.  We decided to try this restaurant on a very busy Friday night.  Despite the fact we did not have a reservation the hostess gave us a very nice intimate booth.  Our waitress Shelby was very knowledgeable about the menu and the wine list.  She suggested a very nice Italian red that we had not tried before.  Our favorite dish was the carbonara.  This was one of the best I've ever had.  I hope that everyone who was previously a fan of Coppola gives Cafe Renzo a try.
Fantastic service. Nicely decorated restaurant with a really cute outdoor area with heaters.  Food is pretty good.  Great place to eat outdoors when it's chilly!
Once again I read the reviews and can't believe that people would rate this place five stars, those people don't even know what a five star is. I had lunch there yesterday and they did nearly everything wrong. The hostess was cold and not friendly or engaging, our waitress was a total space cadet. I was hoping for better because I used to frequent this place and like its outdoor area on the street. The panni we ordered was hardly cooked or grilled in fact the cheese and tomato were cold. It took over five minutes for them to bring my drink, my friend ordered soup but got salad instead. I was hoping for a good ceasar but it turned out to be chopped up romaine with a weak dressing and the cheese on top was not enough. I guess the only thing that was good were the croutons, maybe this place will get better but I doubt it if they are starting off this way the will be way out of business on this street fast.
I have been to this cafe twice. Both times for dinner. I have found the food to be superb and the service to be exceptional. I have now placed this restaurant on my list of favorite south bay restaurants. I would recommend this restaurant to anyone without reservation.
I hesitated on granting  the 5th Star because of the sometimes-slow service, but honestly, the food is so good, that it is worth the wait. I have been here 3 times now and I have been impressed from the start. Beautiful interiors, I love the dim ambient lighting, the bar bar is gorgeous and its a nice variety of booth versus table seating. The whole restaurant is small, but feels large,  very smart layout. The food is so good. It's lighter than a lot of wanna-be authentic Italian places, but not light on flavor! I have only been here for dinner, and the most recent time I came, I ordered the exact same thing as the time before because I had been craving it ever since! Must-tries: - Calamari Fritti (Nice, lightly breaded, not oily, option of aoli or marinara for dipping) - Zucca (Butternut squash with croutons, perfectly creamy) - Margherita Pizza - Capesante al prosciutto (Scallops wrapped in prosciutto & sauteed in wine, lemon & butter, with mashed potatoes...AMAZING!!!)
This was our first time, and we stopped in because of a visit to the Apple store--which is just next door.   We were pleasantly surprised by the new venue, staff and menu at the old Coppola location!  Our waiter's name was Andrea Terranova, and I have to say he gave the best service we have experienced in a long time!   Andrea was very attentive, gave great suggestions (after finding out what we might prefer), and accommodating.  My husband had spaghetti bolognese after his Caesar salad with extra anchovies.   The bolognese was made from a mixture of veal, beef, and pork--very tasty!   I tried the carbonara, which was very similar to what I've had in Europe.  The minestrone; however, had too many potatoes in my opinion and wasn't something I would order again (the only reason for the 4 instead of 5 stars).   We tried a couple of Italian wines that Andrea recommended, and both were very good.   We thought that the prices were reasonable as well.  All in all--a great combination in what we like to see in our dining experiences.  We will definitely come back!
nice pizza and mussels
Dined at Cafe Renzo for a delightful lunch with a friend.  Our table outside in the California sun along with a delicious Cesar Salads,  Mussel's, and Panini to share, made for a perfect afternoon lunch!  The service was attentive and polite.
Cafe Renzo is a fantastic place to go to either on a date or with a group of friends. The atmosphere is very classy, warm, and welcoming. The owner Renzo is from Italy and our kids said the pizza here is better than the pizza they ate in Italy. The staff is always friendly and hard working and we LOVE going here for lunch or dinner. We are always pleased when we come here.
Had a calzone (forget which one but all the items had weird things inside (I mean, *seriously*, who actually *likes* eggplants?)). Stanford Late Nite dining's calzones are better.
Enjoyed dinner and service on a November Saturday night when. Renzo greeted us and everything worked smoothly. But went there for lunch on a November Friday and no Renzo, no service, barely passable food. Moral: If a smiling Italian named Renzo is not around, things are different.
My wife  and I have become devotees of Cafe Renzo on University Ave in Palo Alto. It is a lively Italian Bistro with reverence for fresh food tastefully prepared. Young Renzo  runs the place, his mother, Mama runs the kitchen. Food is great and service is attentive by very happy real Italian waiters. In fact, I don't know how Renzo does it, all of his staff seem genuinely happy. It has a reasonably priced and varied menu. Good wine list, and the waiters know it and will help choose the right wine  My favorite appetizer is the white anchovies with pesto and extra virgin olive oil. Sounds weird, but is a classic Northern Italian dish.  The fish is actually anchovies which have been soaked, drained  and marinated in oil and vinegar. They turn white, lose their biting saltiness and actually remind me of marinated herring. The accompanying pesto is pure... No pine nuts, garlic or cheese. Simple, just the way I like it. My wife's favorite is the Camponata...very flavorful. If you order it, be sure to enunciate the word. Twice we were served  Carbonara which a pasta dish and completely different. Pasta portions are large, so could be shared. The minestrone soup is pure, simple, tasty, healthy, and hearty, especially when you have them add Parmesan spooned  from a large bowl before your very eyes. Salads are perfectly dressed with leaves so fresh they could have come from the ground just before serving.The kitchen will work with you if  you have a special request. For example, one time when I was there I ordered something that was not on the menu. Their linguine is perfect, as is their pesto, so I asked them to prepare a linguine pesto dressed with EVVO and that wonderful Parmesan. I was in heaven.  We were there last night and the couple next to us had ordered a Calzone that was custom made and not the one on the menu. They will accommodate. Do I have strong feelings about this place? You bet
Ate here on a Tue nite and it was quiet inside.  Service was good and my server was knowledgeable about the menu.  The salad and spaghetti were both good.  They also have a selection of wines by the glass and while the wines are nice they bring them out in this little beaker and then pour it into your glass. Presumably the beaker guarantees you're getting the right amount.  Its funny, after reading the other reviews that raved about the bread, to have to write that the bread was the part of the meal I liked least!  It tasted almost like the bread in Umbria, which is made without salt.   I will be going back here again.
Too much salt, too much wallpaper, two stars. Neopolitan food, aka painfully salty. Salty salmon, salty pizzas, salty spaghetti bolognese, salty caeser salad. My husband liked the carpaccio and it came with a pile of arugula and he likes arugula. Waiter was good. The prices are fair. The atmosphere is weird as if all of the former-failed restaurants left a bit of their decor behind. However, I think it was planned that way and is supposed to be some post-modern Versailles, baroque, gaudy-esque something or other, like that horrid monstrosity in Vegas ("oh, which one?") called Wynn, but it made me want to close my eyes and nap...come to think of it, the room itself seemed to want to do the same, like an overdressed, bored queen yawning on her gilded throne.
A great new spot. Really good food (I can't stop eating the linguine con vongole) at reasonable prices, excellent wine list also not overly marked up. Renzo is a great guy with lots of experience, and he's working hard to make his own place a big success. He has our vote!
Just had the perfect dinner there last night with friends.  Delicious caprese salad (the mozarella was divine).  I had the spaghetti bolognese.  Delicious.  Chocolate mousse outstanding.  Perfect foamy capuccino.  Prices totally reasonable.  Our waiter was wonderful - helpful, flirty, authentic.  We sat outside and they turned on the heat lamps w/out us having to ask just as it was getting chilly.  We sat as long as we wanted to sit.  Didn't feel rushed.  The perfect Palo Alto summer night.  I have nothing, not one thing, that I can think of that would have made the evening any nicer.  I can't wait to go back another time.
I went to dinner here on a Thursday night with two friends and had a wonderful experience. Authentic delicious Italian food as well as an authentic Italian waiter. We found the service to be right on and our waiter also suggested a lovely Italian wine. Can't wait to go back.
